Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
Number of Reviews
34

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
Ronin sports one of the best car chases in recent memory.  The chase
(the film's third) has cars speed in and out of tunnels, in wrong
directions on major highways, and through narrow, scenic
pedestrian-littered streets.  It conjures up memories of _The French
Connection_, _To Live and Die in L.A._ and _Speed_ all at once, and
further transcends them due to its distinctively Euro look.  The ride is
thrilling.  The accidents are devastating.  And yet, there's something
so, so, plastic and nihilistic about the whole setup.
I mention this because _Ronin_ wants to be the first _Pulp Fiction_
clone hitting the foreign espionage circuit.  Like _Fiction_, it sports
an excellent diverse cast, each character with mixed motives.  Robert
DeNiro is the American, Jean Reno (_The Professional_, _Godzilla_) is
the Frenchman, Stellan Skarsgard (_Breaking the Waves_, _Good Will
Hunting_) is the German, and Natasha McElphone (_Truman Show_) is the
mysterious Irish ringleader.  The cast plays off each other with the
standard personas each has been associated with.
The film even has a _Fiction_-esque McGuffin--a mysterious silver
briefcase.  "What's in the case?" asks DeNiro, repeatedly.  Perhaps the
mathematical "process" described in _The Spanish Prisoner_.
But, also like _PF_, there is such a casual disregard for human life
that it is ultimately off-putting.  What made _Pulp Fiction_ work and
_Ronin_ less satisfactory is that _Pulp Fiction_ worked on a much
smaller scale, with every death in that film being economic and
significant in its storyline/shock value.  _Ronin_ spends too much of
its time shooting, crashing, and killing that it gives us no reason to
care for its central characters.  Or charicatures.
Back to that car chase.  The camera captures the car running down a few
pedestrians.  Cut to: interior look of car, McElphone is unfazed.  No
dialogue.  No fear of getting caught.  Cut to: car no. 2, with Jean Reno
in the driver's seat.  Six cars crash right behind him, yet he keeps
going, expressionless.  The audience's adrenaline is pumping, but both
characters and their passengers, are sedate.  What gives?
This goes on for nearly ten minutes.  The city is destroyed.  Innocent
bystanders die.  Fifty cars get demolished.  Yet very few police cars
respond.  (Were they on strike?)  And the oncoming traffic seems
incomprehensibly calm over the ensuing havoc. ( Did the traffic reports
prepare them?)
I suppose we, as imbecillic movie patrons can watch that and think,
"Wow, that's so cool."  James Bond doesn't flinch, why should they?  My
take: for a film that is meant to be taken with a grain of salt, it has
a devastating ancillary tone.  It takes everything way too seriously,
from its travellogue/historical settings, to its
every-day-is-a-rainy-day cinematography, to the let's throw in every
hard-to-understand accent we can find in its dialogue, to its wink-wink
references of the CIA, KGB and (here's the clincher) IRA.
The final scene ruined it for me.  Without spoiling the film, there is a
scene terribly reminiscent of _Snake Eyes_, except, at least in _that_
film, the police acted somewhat responsibly, the crowds became involved
with the crime, and, ultimately, justice was served.  Here, a
devastating threat is made, said threat is actually followed through,
and... nothing comes of it.  We see the victims, but the bad guy, at
least that one particular bad guy whose face is concealed, gets away.
Why waste our time?  There's enough illogical madmen getting away with
horrific crimes displayed on our nightly news.
So I could not care for the characters.  Consequently, the story bored
me. Hence, I cannot recommend this film.  And yet... there _is_ that
wonderful car chase.  I'm torn.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Ronin (1998)
Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone, Stellan Skarsgard, Sean 
Bean, Skipp Sudduth, Michael Lonsdale, Jan Triska, Jonathan Pryce, Feodor 
Atkine, Katarina Witt, Bernard Bloch. Music by Elia Cmiral. Screenplay by 
David Mamet (under the pseudonym Richard Weisz) and J.D. Zeik. 
Cinematography by Robert Fraisse. Produced by Frank Mancuso Jr. Directed 
by John Frankenheimer. 121 minutes.
Rated R, 3 stars (out of five stars)
Following a morning press screening of "Ronin," the theater manager met 
me and a fellow critic in the lobby and asked what we thought of the 
action thriller. When we each said that we enjoyed the film, he took a 
step backwards in shock, as if we'd popped him in the head with a ball-
peen hammer, then exclaimed in utter amazement, "I can't believe it! How 
could you...why would you...I mean, it was total crap!" 
I laughed and said, "It was like sitting at home on a lazy Saturday 
afternoon, watching one of those old-fashioned action movies where you 
don't care about the plot because it's so much fun simply watching car 
chases and big stars shooting at each other." "That's exactly what's 
wrong with it," he said. "There was no substance, just clichés and car 
chases."
"But that was all on purpose," I countered, "The director deliberately 
threw in virtually every movie cliché in the book. John Frankenheimer is 
no dummy. He was winking at us! Besides, Robert De Niro and Jean Reno are 
two of the greats and watching them work together was good enough for me.
" The theater manager shook his head and said, "Aw, you like those two so 
much that you're letting them blind your judgment. And as for all that 
'winking at us' business, well, that's just not enough anymore."
We changed the subject at this point, realizing that with this particular 
film we would find no common ground. I've included the exchange here 
because, although I disagree with my associate, his point of view is 
valid and deserves recognition. That "Ronin" is a virtual cavalcade of 
film clichés is inarguable. My contention is that Frankenheimer's use of 
those clichés is part of his artistry.
Set in France, "Ronin" deals with a group of mercenaries hired by an 
operative (Natascha McElhone) to retrieve a heavily-guarded briefcase 
before another shadowy group snags it. The mercenaries are highly-skilled 
ex-government agents, ready to work without asking questions, as long as 
the price is right. Who are the two groups and what is inside the 
briefcase? It doesn't matter and that's the beauty of "Ronin." 
Working from a script by David Mamet (using a pseudonym due to a Writer's 
Guild conflict), John Frankenheimer strips the action thriller genre down 
to its bare bones. These films aren't about plot, they're about plot 
mechanics. They're not about well-drawn characters, they're about 
archetypes exchanging quips. They're not about logic, they're about sound 
and motion set against exotic locales. 
So what does he give us? World-weary soldiers and an earthy young beauty 
racing through gorgeous French cities. Elaborate plans in musty rooms and 
intricate double-crosses. Daring gun battles and high speed car chases 
down narrow streets and twisting mountain roads. And, most important, 
conversations between Robert De Niro and Jean Reno.
De Niro and Reno compliment each other in grand fashion, first as wary 
coworkers and later as comrades who bond under duress. As American ace 
strategist Sam, De Niro is efficiency personified; a seasoned agent who 
knows the importance of maintaining his cool no matter how dire the 
situation. He also chooses to keep his background to himself. Asked if he 
has every killed anyone, he allows the tiniest hint of a smile as he 
answers "I hurt somebody's feelings once." Jean Reno plays Vincent, a 
French procurer and facilitator who radiates calm as he goes about his 
business. Regardless of his actions, you sense that this is an inherently 
decent man. 
In keeping with the motif of minimalism, the rest of the cast are rough 
sketches, with each exhibiting only one identifying characteristic. 
That's fine, since De Niro and Reno provide all the character required 
for a film like this. Their exchanges are punctuated by hair-raising car 
chases and elaborate set pieces. High points include a night time battle 
near the Seine, a sly reconnaissance mission at the Majestic Hotel in 
Cannes, and a climatic stand-off during an ice show. Frankenheimer douses 
each set piece with classic movie clichés: billboards telegraph upcoming 
scenes and there's a fruit cart on every street, just waiting to be 
overturned during the next chase sequence. 
What does it all add up to? For me, it was a refreshing visit to the good 
old days of charismatic actors engaged in intricate, exciting and 
pointless bedlam. For my theater manager friend, it was a maddening 
example of all that's wrong with contemporary cinema. If you're so 
inclined, check out "Ronin" and decide which one of us was right.

Author
Chad Polenz
1998, R, 121 minutes [2 hours, 1 minute]
Starring: Robert De Niro (Sam), Jean Reno (Vincent), Natascha McElhone
(Dierdre), Stellan Skarsgĺrd (Gregor); written by J.D. Zeik, David Mamet [as
Richard Weisz]; produced by Frank Mancuso Jr.; directed by John Frankenheimer.
Seen October 4, 1998 at 1:40 p.m. at the Rotterdam Square Mall Cinema 6
(Rotterdam, NY), theater #6, by myself for free using my Sony/Loews critic's
pass. [theater rating: ***: good seats, sound and picture]
        Mercenaries never get a good rep in the movies. They always come off as cold-
hearted, inherently evil guys who enjoy killing people they don't know for
money. Maybe they're not really so vile in reality, maybe they're the same
flesh-and-blood people as everyone else, and that's the angle "Ronin" takes
with its story of modern day warriors just looking for a purpose for their
existence.
        The problem the huge blockbuster Hollywood films about international
espionage, terrorism and other such things that will lead to double-crosses,
shoot outs, explosions, and other forms of action is that they try too hard to
create a convincing story. They just drop tons of meaningless details on us as
if we could really follow them. This film takes just the opposite angle. It
barely tells us anything, five minutes into the film and we're already in the
middle of something. It's significance is unknown at the time, but it's pretty
exciting because it doesn't try to dumb its story down.
        We meet a group of international mercs who have been hired, apparently, by an
Irish revolutionary lead by a stern woman named Diedre (McElhone), who is as
gruff as any of the men she has hired, but still has a sense of delicateness
to her. Her team is the generic multi-pack of specialist mercs. There's Sam
(De Niro), an American with great detective and field skills - he's probably
ex-CIA as he uses tactics to further his and the group's mission that anyone
could do, such as take a picture of the enemy and test his reflex skills
without seeming remotely suspicious. De Niro is great here, as if he's wanted
to be in a role like this for years - he's practically Batman. Jean Reno co-
stars as a French operative named Vincent. If Sam is Batman, then he's Robin -
not quite as cunning, but learns fast and then applies his knowledge. Other
members of the group include a cocky British merc, an American car and weapons
specialist, and a Russian computer specialist named Gregor (Skarsgĺrd) whose
brain is his best weapon, although it does tend to backfire on him.
        The crew's mission is to retrieve a steel suitcase from a group of generic,
well-armed and equipped villains who will be intent on stopping them. Sam
constantly questions the contents of the case, but he never gets much in the
way of answer. All we know is it's worth killing people over and thousands of
dollars in compensation to the mercs if they can get it.
        This plot setup might seem a little basic, but that's where the film throws
us for a loop. What seems like such a simple task (well, if using computers to
track the villains and lots of heavy artillery to slaughter carloads of them
is considered simple) turns out to be quite complicated. We don't know what's
in that case but its importance continues to escalate once the massive action
scenes kick in showing the mercs attempts to nab it.
        And the action scenes are totally fantastic in all meanings of the word.
Those kinds of car-chases-through-narrow-city-streets-while-firing-
machineguns-and-blowing-stuff-up scenes have become generic to the extreme
over recent years, and yet they're captivating here, even when the "fruit
cart!" is obvious and the precise driving at tremendously high speeds are
Hollywood staples all the way. Why do such cliches work here when they rarely
do elsewhere? I can't answer that honestly, but I guess it's because there's a
sense of old-school roots here. Director John Frankenheimer is no stranger to
action, in fact, he's one of the founding fathers of the genre. His direction
makes for a sense of organized chaos, not just chaos as other directors might
go for. There's a real sense of danger and reality here. Setting the film in
the old, narrow streets of France, mostly in Paris is a nice change of pace
from the freeways of L.A. and the back alleys of New York.
        But the story is not as simple as car chases and fire fights. As intense as
they are, the sense of mystery is just as compelling. One of the mercs has
turned out to be a traitor and the rest are then disbanded and some killed.
Sam and Vincent stick together forming a friendship and a real trust for each
other. They reveal what they've learned over the years and continue to
demonstrate their excellent detective skills. They don't have access to a
roomful of computers and high-tech gadgets, they use common sense and the
reliable gut instinct. Sometimes this takes them places, sometimes it nearly
kills them. 
        In any case the story is constantly evolving, revealing more and more about
the nature of all the parties involved. Who's REALLY working for who and what
their goal is. The significance of the case continues to shape the story, not
only in terms of the people who want it, but its simpler aspects such as where
a duplicate could be bought and switched. It's this kind of basic logic that
the film uses to show how clever it can be. 
        What's also unique is the film's use of selective scripting. David Mamet co-
wrote the film under a pseudonym, and his scenes of dialogue and mood are
quite obvious. I suspect he had much to do with the film's idiosyncratic and
detailed moments between the action. The scene in which the title is
explained, that is, of warriors in Feudal Japan whose masters were killed and
were then dishonored before of it, is one of the best. These men could
certainly serve their counties well, but why don't they? Perhaps they once did
but found that playing by the rules sucks, or perhaps they were at one time
and were evicted in one way or another and are convinced that being a
mercenary is the way of penance or perhaps just to spite the world.  
        Not only are the effects and direction convincing, but it's the words the
characters say to support each other that show a sense of initiative. In
Hollywood, blood is only to be splattered, good guys never get shot, and
wounds are taken care of by just wrapping them in gauze. Here we're shown a
few scenes in which one of our main characters has been shot and needs real
medical attention, not just first aid. How many other action movies take
bullet-removal from the abdomen seriously?
        The only major problem is the final act could have been a bit stronger and
more plausible. The film is very complicated but why does it feel the need to
slow down as it approaches its climax? The climax isn't that much more
thrilling than what had come before, and doesn't answer many questions. 
        I don't think Jerry Seinfeld would have liked "Ronin." He claims to be "the
guy you see standing around in the parking lot afterwards saying, 'Oh, you
mean that was the same guy from the beginning? Oh.' and the guy that keeps
asking, 'Wasn't he with them? Why'd they kill him if he was with them? Oh, he
wasn't really with them? It's a good thing they killed him then.'"


Author
Scott Renshaw
     Since time immemorial -- Memorial Day 1996, to be precise -- one
question has plagued movie-goers the world over:  what might MISSION:
IMPOSSIBLE have looked like if someone had shown the faintest interest in
telling a coherent story?  As answer, I give you RONIN, an international
espionage thriller fueled by as much brain power as adrenaline.  The
comparison to MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE is almost too easy, especially given the
presence of Jean Reno in both casts, but it's a telling comparison
nonetheless.  RONIN shows how much more effective a film can be when set
pieces are connected by ideas.
     The film opens in Paris, where a man known only as Sam (Robert
DeNiro) joins a multi-national band of mercenaries employed by Irish
nationalist Deirdre (Natascha McElhone).  Vincent (Jean Reno) is the
team's French location expert; Gregor (Stellan Skarsgaard) oversees
electronic surveillance; Spence (Sean Bean) is the weapons specialist;
Larry (Skipp Sudduth) serves as their driver.  Their mission is obtaining
a certain silver case by any means necessary, the contents unknown to the
operatives but obviously much in demand.  As the operation begins,
alliances quickly shift with the prevailing winds, no lofty ideal more
important than the exigencies of the moment.
     That notion both drives the film and provides its title.  As
explained in too-literal (especially given a later, more subtle
explanation) on-screen titles, "ronin" is a term for masterless samurai in
feudal Japan, forced to survive as bandits or swords-for-hire without the
honor of serving a worthy lord.  Sam, Vincent and company, all of whom
once served as government agents or soldiers, are now down-sized Cold
Warriors without a patriotic purpose.  MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE flirted with
the same concept, but it was to turn characters into vengeance-driven
super-villains.  They function in RONIN as free agents, loyal only to
themselves, suspicious and treacherous because everyone around them could
be more suspicious or more treacherous.  The characters are sketched in
only the most basic terms, in keeping with their private natures, yet they
are given presence by actors like DeNiro and Reno bringing mournful weight
to their performances.  Though few words are spoken in the script by J. D.
Zeik and Richard Weisz (a.k.a. David Mamet), the very lack of human
interaction between the characters speaks volumes.
     For a fairly introspective film, RONIN is also a fairly exciting one.
Director John Frankenheimer goes to the car chase well perhaps once too
often, but those he uses are tense and well-constructed.  The action level
is as high in RONIN as it has been in any summer blockbuster of the last
few years, and it's _better_ action, more white-knuckle gripping than
whoop-it-up flashy.  For some viewers, that may be reason enough to spend
two hours at the movies, but it's all the more impressive because the
action serves the story.  Every subsequent violent encounter raises the
stakes in this chaotic world, while it's always clear that the combatants
neither know nor care what they're fighting for.
     RONIN certainly has its share of jagged edges, notably the
aforementioned opening titles and a distracting romantic sub-plot between
DeNiro and McElhone.  Some may find the characters too remote and
under-developed, and consequently find it difficult to invest emotionally
in the story.  I found the chilly isolation of the characters exactly what
Ineeded to become emotionally invested; the emptiness of their lives and
actions _is_ the hook.  This isn't earth-shaking profundity we're talking
about, merely the building blocks of effective drama -- the visceral
coupled with the intellectual, actions with consequences.  Consequences
were never really an issue in MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE, which makes it that
much easier to appreciate what RONIN has to offer.  It's no longer a James
Bond landscape of world domination.  For once, evil in an espionage
thriller isn't what people do, but why they do it.

Author
John Beachem
After watching this film, I sat back and realized I'd been on the edge of my
seat the entire time, and my hands were gripping the armrests. Looking back on
this, I can't for the life of me figure out what it is about this particular
movie that so engrossed me.
Ronin are samurai who have no master. Modern Ronin appear to be men trained in
arts such as espionage, assassination, and combat who have no country to serve.
Therefore, they choose to line their own pockets. Five such men are hired by an
irish woman who goes only by the name of Dierdre. They are hired to steal a
silver briefcase from a band of men, and deliver it to her. The plan hardly
goes off without a hitch since none of the men trust each other. One of them
grabs the case for himself with the intent of selling it to the highest bidder.
The remaining men, led by Sam go after him in an attempt to get the case, and
thus their money.
Let me say right now, that I'm not entirely sure how to go about reviewing this
film. It sounds like so many other typical action movies, complete with some
great looking car chases and a whole lot of explosions. However, there is
something strangely different about this one. More enthralling. I'm sure part
of the movie's charm is the presence of DeNiro and Reno, two wonderful actors.
There is nothing even remotely resembling character development, but this
strangely adds to the story. It makes these men more mysterious and dangerous.
A lot of things are never adequately explained, such as why the group is
attacked in one of the first scenes involving them, and to warn everyone right
now, we never discover the contents of the much sought after case. Also worth
noting, Stellan Skarsgard is quite good as the cold blooded Gregor, but there
is an early scene in which he demonstrates his amazing reflexes for no apparent
reason since we never see them used in the rest of the film.
So, a few pointless scenes are present, but the majority of the film is quite
well done, and the car chases are enthralling. For some great action, good
acting, and a rather bizzare plot, Ronin earns four stars.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Author
Marty Mapes
*** (out of 4) RONIN tries to be a thinking man's thriller. It doesn't
succeed in that endeavor, but it approaches the action with such vigor
and confidence that it ends up being an excellent flick. 
Sam (Robert DeNiro), an American freelance mercenary, meets his contact
in a French café. He has been hired by an Irish agent (Natascha
McElhone) to acquire a certain briefcase. Joining Sam are Vincent (Jean
Reno), the French acquirer; Gregor (Stellan Skarsgĺrd), the
possibly-German agent with catlike reflexes; and Spence (Sean Bean), the
overeager young Englishman. 
The contents of the briefcase are secret, even to the audience. This was
one of Frankenheimer's devices to increase the depth of the film. The
idea is that without knowing what they are fighting for, these
mercenaries must carefully examine their motives and loyalties. But when
Sam is told he can't know the contents, he ups his price and ends the
conversation. So much for the thought- provoking device. Actually, it
doesn't detract from the film at all, it just doesn't have the
importance that Frankenheimer had obviously hoped for. 
Before they begin their mission, the crew stocks up on weapons and
technology. The scene of the weapons buy introduces us to the movie's
intricately planned, paranoid action scenes. First Sam gets a funny
feeling that something isn't right. Then Spence notices that only some
of the shipment has been delivered. The dealers try to lure the
mercenaries into a trap, giving them their first taste of danger on a
mission destined to be filled with it. 
If I were to see the movie again, I might appreciate the way this scene
makes the characters question their loyalty to an unknown cause. But
because the tension and action were so deftly handled, I was too
engrossed to be thinking about the big picture. Ironically, that also
contributes to why I say Frankenheimer didn't fully succeed in what he
intended. 
The mysterious case is now in Italy, and our anti-heroes plan their
attack. The level of detail in their plan is fascinating. The 30 minutes
or so that goes into setting up the big grab is as cunning as the best
caper, heist, or spy movie. The plan culminates in an outstanding action
sequence full of amazing stunts and adrenalin-pumping car chases. 
Admittedly, the chase scene has a few hackneyed moments - the
Construction-on-the-Roadway, the Fish Cart, and that timeless classic,
the Vegetable Stand With Stacked Boxes. Seems like it shouldn't be so
difficult to think up some new obstacles, but maybe the filmmakers were
paying homage to the great cinematic tradition that is the car chase. 
Regardless, Frankenheimer can be forgiven some clichés, because he
avoided the use of digital effects in the car chase scenes. It's an
expensive decision, but the results are worth it. When a stunt is real,
it is a feat worthy of the medium - an amazing act of ingenuity and
bravery immortalized on film. When a stunt is computer-generated, (or
faked by sound effects and deceptive editing) the gut-level excitement
and tension just isn't there. In RONIN, it's there, thanks to some of
the best car chases on film. 
Needless to say, Sam and company do not retrieve the case (the movie's
only half over). The second half of the movie has them tracking the case
as before, but this half lacks the cleverness and intricate planning
introduced earlier. There is more action and as much tension, but it
doesn't have the finesse of the first hour, and its absence is felt. 
The second half of the film reintroduces the question of loyalty and
explains the film's title. The Ronin, we are told, were a group of
samurai whose master was betrayed and killed. They banded together,
lordless, to exact their revenge. When the Ronin executed the traitor,
they still didn't have a master and they no longer had a crusade, so
they committed ritual suicide. "They chose honor, they chose myth," says
Jean-Pierre (Michael Lonsdale, who is very good in this marginal role).
"They chose wrong," retorts Sam, reinforcing the film's easy answer to
the its own questions about loyalty. 
Like the device of the mystery case, this scene is an attempt to add a
level of depth to the film. But like the device of the mystery case, it
doesn't succeed. 
Even without Sam's curt response, the scene doesn't add much, because
the movie goes out of its way to introduce Jean-Pierre. It is a little
too convenient that Vincent knows this particular man in this particular
town, right when they need a place to hole up. Instead of this keystone
metaphor arising from the action, it feels as though it has been
carefully placed on top of the action. 
After they leave Jean-Pierre, the mercenaries head back to France, hot
on the trail of the prized case. One final breathtaking car chase (the
one that will be remembered) keeps the film's pace brisk, right up to
the obligatory twist ending. 
The ultimate ending, the one that explains the significance of the
mission, seems like one final contrivance, one last attempt by
Frankenheimer to make this action movie appear smarter than it really
is. Nevertheless, the addition of this (and the other) devices never
really hurt the movie. That's because as a pure action-thriller, RONIN
is far above average.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Simon Calloway
 Ronin is easily the best car-chase film I have ever seen.  It contains scenes
so thrilling, I had to grip my seat til the car came to a crash ending.  The
film reminded my of the 1997-Kurt Russell film Breakdown, in the sense that
both films are breathtaking at filming suspense-filled chase scenes.
 The story of Ronin is rather complicated.  All I can say is that a bunch of
international espionage, ex-KGB, ex- CIA operatives form an elite in Paris to
thwart a briefcase from a power man who is hand-cuffed to it.  What is in the
case, I will not say.  Although, Sam (De Niro) really wants to find out.
 The rest of Ronin contains the group (also including Reno) trying to get the
case from the "unlucky blok" with ways that even James Bond may have looked
negatively at.  But, Ronin looks 100 percent real, compaired to 1997's 007
Tomorrow Never Dies.
 Ronin is a fast-paced, thrilling, expertly-crafted, excellently acted spy film
that put my faith back into action movies (1997's Con Air pretty much destroyed
all of my expectations).

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: John Frankenheimer
Writers: J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz (story by Zeik)
Starring: Robert DeNiro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone, Stellan Skarsgĺrd,
Jonathan Pryce, Skipp Suddeth, Sean Bean, Michel Lonsdale, Katarina Witt
"Ronin" is the latest spy/secret agent film, and it's nicely original that
it deals with secret agents who have no national affiliate(s).  The title
"Ronin" refers to a Japanese term referring to Samurai who have lost their
leader, and are therefore supposed to roam the world trying to avenge their
leader's death.  Not one character in this film aren't Japanese, but are in
fact an international group of secret agents who have lost all connection
to their countries and are now ready to sell themselves to the highest
bidder.
There are five Ronin members in this film: Sam (Robert DeNiro), the
leader-type and an ex-CIA opperative; Vincent (Jean Reno), a Frenchman;
Gregor (Stellan Skarsgĺrd), a Russian computer-expert; Larry (Skipp
Suddeth), an expert car-driver; and Spence (Sean Bean), an unexperienced
British arms-man.  As the film begins, they are all working on a job for a
mysterious man whom they don't meet at first (Jonathan Pryce), but who is
represented by an Irish tough-as-nails opperative, Dierdre (Natascha
McElhone).
The running gag, of course, is that they don't know eachother and have no
ties to anyone but themselves.  Each character is cloaked in mystery, even
from the viewer, and since nothing short of short sentences are said about
their past (When asked why she became a secret agent, Dierdre says she was
"tricked by a man."  Weirdly enough, the same goes for Sam), all you can
tell about each character is from the way they talk and act in the
beginning of the film, in a long and drawn-out sequence that acts like it's
going to be an introduction to their activities and instead ends up being
an introduction to their personalities.
Their job, as charged by Dierdre, is to steal a much-coveted metal suitcase
from a French billionaire of sorts who has it in his possession, but is
desired by several countries, namely Ireland and Russia.  Like the suitcase
in "Pulp Fiction," it's contents are never revealed, but as the film
proceeds, it's passed from person to person, and from country to country,
all the while being pursued by the Ronin members, or what's left of them as
the film proceeds.
It's a lot like many other espionnage thrillers, what with it's
overly-complex story, cliched use of betrayals, and its insistence to
follow up several of the twists with car chases.  On the other hand, the
story is exciting and always in motion; not too many dull or wasted moments
here.  The betrayals are nicely done, as the characters are always
interesting yet mysterious so that you at least have someone to really like
or really hate when they come to pass. And the car chases, namely two of
them, are so amazingly exciting that even if you feel that they're
unnecessary (and at least one of them is), you can't help but get caught up
in them.
The film was directed by old school director John Frankenheimer, a man
who's had a sad up-and-down career, with ups such as "The Manchurian
Candidate" and "Seven Days in May," and downs such as, well, 1996's "The
Island of Dr. Moreau."  Here, he directs with visual flair.  Every scene is
tensely directed, and difficult not to watch.  He allows his actors to
really show their talents in small bits of human comedy.  And most notably,
his direction of the two chief car chases are so well-done that they
almost, almost rank up there with the likes of the ones in "Bullit" and
"The French Connection."  They are taut, exciting, and brilliantly edited,
especially with several shots taken from the point of view of the cars,
which are usually going about 80 miles per hour and either on packed
highways or car-less European streets.  When watching them, I had one thing
to say: "Wow!"
The actors are all in top form, especially Robert DeNiro, who doesn't just
play the silent-but-tough character; his Sam is a witty, human character,
and DeNiro hits every single right note in his performance.  Other great
performances come from Reno, who's becoming more and more comfortable with
the camera with every performance; McElhone, who's tough and cold, almost
lovably so; Skarsgĺrd, who's dryness is almost unerrving; and Pryce, who
sinks his teeth into a role that you just can't believe is this
over-the-top.
One other major reason this works so well is a script that is excellent,
and with a good reason: it was co-written by none other than David Mamet,
who appears under the psuedonym of Richard Weisz.  The dialogue is key
Mamet: it has rhythm, it's witty, and it exhibits each of the character's
idiosyncrasies deftly.  The scenes are surprisingly uncorny, especially a
couple of the shake-down scenes (a scene between one character and
Skarsgĺrd in a car is just amazing).  Just goes to prove that a script by
Mamet can really benefit any film.
But it's really the little moments that push the envolope for "Ronin" and
make it much better than your average secret agent thriller.  Some scenes
that are played for either plot or moodiness really have some nice payoffs,
in particular one where DeNiro and McElhone try to spy on the French
billionaire with the suitcase.  And who can deny that the
soon-to-be-infamous surgery scene wasn't the most disgusting and
painful-but-in-a-good-way scene to watch since the toilet scene in
"Trainspotting?"  Little moments are often the things that really make a
film enjoyable - could "Good Will Hunting" have been a really good movie if
it hadn't had the "Do you like apples?" moment? - and when this film takes
off, it's not because of the mechanics of the plot, but those moments that
just thrill us in one way or another.
"Ronin" could be called a bit of a mess, though, and it can be called
confusing.  The plot is very mechanical, and it jumps around so much that
it may be a little disorienting to try and shuffle things out and come to a
conclusion.  But "Ronin" is not about plot.  It's about the experience and
thrill of espionnage.  When what's left with the Ronin group keeps trying
to get back the suitcase long after any reason would be justifiable, the
only thing that keeps them going, really, is not honor or pride, but just a
mad desire to do the job they love.  That's what keeps the audience going
when the plot has become so complex that it's tough to understand
everything that has happened: they're just having such a good time.
Frankenheimer has really made a soon-to-be classic with "Ronin."  It's
exciting, intelligent, fun, as if it were a non-serious adaptation of a Tom
Clancy novel, although with some Irish and Russian politics thrown in for
good reason.  What can you say about a film that features performances from
not one, not two, but three Bond villains (them being Michael Lonsdale,
Sean Bean, and Jonathan Pryce) other than "wow."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Homer Yen
Rober DeNiro plays Sam, a man who never walks into a place he doesn't
know how to walk out of.'  As a former operative, he is cunning in his
approach, skilled at hunting his prey, and is now a
mercenary-for-hire.  He has just been given a job to steal a
mysterious suitcase.  To pull off this heist, however, he'll need at
least a few other specialists including international stars Jean Reno
and Stellan Skarsgard.  They painstaking plot out their attack plan,
scope out their targets and develop escape routes.  They position
themselves carefully and work together to execute a flawless heist. 
Or is it flawless?  
"Ronin" is a cloak-and-dagger thriller marked by beautiful French
locales, hidden agendas, double-crosses, secretive employers, and
intense car chases.  In fact, the strongest asset of this film is the
incredible car chases that could easily be considered some of the best
car chase sequences EVER shot on film (and certainly the best that
I've ever seen), which takes them through crowded downtown streets and
through oncoming highway traffic. I also liked DeNiro's almost deadpan
approach to his task and his sense of cold, professional detachment. 
This is a man that focuses solely on his mission. Everything else,
such as his possible attraction for one of his employers or even his
bullet wounds, is just an afterthought.  
"Ronin" doesn't fail to generate suspense.  Yet, despite this being a
competent production, this film winds up leaving a dry taste in your
mouth, and I kept thinking that there was a better movie in here
somewhere.  What happened?  Because the plot is so thin, we begin to
shift our attention to the characters.  However, these professional
killers were so icy cold in nature that a real sense of drama couldn't
be generated.  Also, as the film developed, several other people who
are interested in the contents of the suitcase are introduced, which
made the film a bit confusing.  There are some great gun battles and
chase scenes and I thought that it was really cool how these
professionals could maintain control throughout their frenetic
situations.  But the detached feeling of the film deprived me of the
enjoyment of rooting for the hero and muted the sadness that I might
have otherwise felt for a fallen team member.   "Ronin" could have
been pared down by about 20 minutes, which would have made this more
taut and enjoyable.  As it stands, it came across as somewhat uneven
and lengthy although I thought that there was enough here to merit a
recommendation.  


Author
Luke Buckmaster
RONIN
Cast: Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone, Stellan Skarsgard, Sean
Bean, Skipp Sudduth, Jonathan Pryce, Michael Lonsdale, Katarina Witt
Director: John Frankenheimer
Screenplay: J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz
Australian theatrical release: February 4, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 
2 and a half stars
The plot of Ronin relies heavily on a valuable briefcase.  As in Pulp Fiction,
the contents of this briefcase are never revealed, for the simple fact that
what is inside of it is insignificant to the film's overall meaning.   The
briefcase is a tool - or, if you like, an excuse - to give characters the
chance to entertain us.  That theory pretty much works with all that Ronin has
to offer.  Director John Frankenheimer (who has had more than forty years of
experience in the field) sacrifices a potentially powerful film for the sake
of individual, insignificant moments.  Ordinarily that might work in a
simplistic action flick, but in one that tries to tell as much as Ronin does,
success is somewhat limited.
On paper, Ronin certainly has all the assets of a great action film.  The past
has proven that great action films often do not have great action stars, but
rather, solid dramatic actors having a little fun in slightly easier roles.
The gripping crime saga Heat positioned Al Pacino alongside Robert DeNiro, and
equally peculiar combinations were found in Face/Off (John Travolta and
Nicholas Cage) and The Negotiator (Samuel L. Jackson, Kevin Spacey).  I was
pleased to see DeNiro and Jean Reno (two actors who have proven that they can
do more than just look tough, which they do pretty well anyway) form a solid
partnership, although they end up twiddling their thumbs with too much screen
time and too little to do. 
An international team of covert operatives are hired to retrieve a mysterious
briefcase.  The smart and smug Sam (Robert DeNiro) becomes the obvious leader
of the group.  When asked if he had ever killed anybody, Sam answers "once I
hurt somebody's feelings."  The other operatives are French coordinator
Vincent (Jean Reano), driver Larry (Skipp Sudduth), weapons specialist Spence
(Sean Bean, best known for his role as 006 in Goldeneye) and hi-tech gadgets
specialist Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard).  Holding the team together is employer
Deirdre (Natasha McElhone), who is equally as cold as the people working for
her.  
Ignore the stylish backdrops and sophisticated European settings - Ronin makes
little sense.  Its screenplay by J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz sprouts various
developments, ranging from betrayal to even a hint of romance.  There's a
surprise bad guy, another surprise bad guy, a good guy, another good guy, a
coward, and so forth.  Before Ronin develops its primary characters, more
characters are introduced.  Before Ronin allows us to absorb the seriousness
of its scenarios, another one is on the way.  This makes for tense and often
gripping moments, but I feel that the film would have benefited from a little
more breathing space.  Enemy of the State staged a similar intensity, but this
was done intentionally and intelligently, whereas Ronin seems to try too hard
to keep viewers on the edge of their seats.
Frankenheimer deliberately refrains from developing his central characters.
You will walk away from Ronin not knowing much about who they are or what
motivates them, with the exception of some minor details (Sam is there purely
for the money, that's for sure).  For the most part, the coldness and
bitterness of the film's relationships work on exactly the right levels.  Even
when Sam and Vincent develop a loyal friendship, you get the feeling that
something is holding them back.  Their professionalism is unshakable; if one
saves the life of the other, their initial reaction is not to show their
appreciation, but to return the favor.  DeNiro and Reno give convincing
performances in the most likeable parts, and the bittersweet supporting cast
get their moments to shine.
In a silly little voice over at the film's completion, Frankenheimer almost
seems to be asking us not to condemn his film for its lack of emotion.  Whilst
I appreciated the way Ronin captures the spirit of the killer for hire
industry, Frankenheimer spells it out to us in big bright letters, rather than
allowing viewers to walk away with a personal interpretation as to how it
works.  The industry is cold.  C - O - L - D.
"A thinking man's action pic" is the general description that many have given
this film. My two cents says that its creators certainly did think about what
they were doing, but tried to make too much out of too little.  Ronin
certainly has many rewarding moments (including a couple of eye popping chase
scenes), and a handful of performances of an unusually high standard.  But
Frankenheimer never lets his settings or characters come alive in the way they
should have.  Not only does he sacrifice a potentially powerful film for the
sake of some exciting moments, but also a wide range of intriguing characters
for a wide range of inaccessible ones.  


Author
David Sunga
Written by: J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz
Starring: Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone, Stellan
Skarsgard
Ingredients: Ex-CIA agent, crew of former spies on a mysterious mission
Synopsis: 
In the Japanese legend of THE 47 RONIN, the master of 47 samurai was
killed by a rival nobleman. The 47 samurai, whose job was to serve and
protect their master, were so disgraced that they went into hiding as
beggars, thieves and assorted riff raff while plotting their
counterattack. One day they stormed the rival's stronghold and killed
their former master's enemy. Then, all 47 walked out to the courtyard
and committed seppuku (ritual suicide) by hara kiri (gut cut). 
RONIN's title refer to this ancient legend, and not to the 1990s modern
Japanese meaning of Ronin (high school students who are in limbo because
they aren't able to pass Japanese college entrance exams). In RONIN a
motley crew of broke and aging ex-agents from the Cold War are compared
to the Japanese ronin of legend, in that both are now masterless lethal
servants. 
The crew of money-starved ex-agents from the Cold War are randomly
thrown together by an anonymous high paying client who gives them
information and pays them through a mysterious Irish Republican Army
lady (Natascha McElhone). They are not given any information other than
that their mission is to attack a convoy of black cars in France and
recover a briefcase. This of course leads to shootouts and car chases
involving anonymous guys in sunglasses and betrayals by untrustworthy
teammates. The main character Sam the American former CIA guy (Robert De
Niro) teams up with Vincent, ex-agent from France, in order to recover
the briefcase.
Opinion:
The main character Sam is always trying to figure out exactly who has
mysteriously hired him, whom he's being hired to kill, and what's so
special about the briefcase he's supposed to recover. 
In the end, we do find out who the mysterious client is, but in the
meantime a lot of small token witticisms are revealed about how to be an
agent, and how to not ask questions, and how not to reveal too much to
interrogators. Despite all the chases and gunplay, RONIN is not an
action movie, but a kind of spy thriller explaining the character of
these RONIN: how they act, how they react, and what makes them tick. In
that respect, the contents of the briefcase and the identity of the
briefcase owners are completely irrelevant and only illustrate the
nature of this kind of work. 
One interesting thing about RONIN is its Western interpretation of the
47 Ronin legend. In the Japanese version, the 47 Ronin committed seppuku
to atone for their disgrace and dishonor in failing to protect their
liege. Basically they were saying, "We failed to protect the master. We
killed the bad guy, but that's still no excuse for our disgrace." In the
RONIN movie version, however, a Frenchman suggests to Sam that that the
47 Ronin actually committed hara kiri because, like the Cold War spies,
they found they no longer served a higher calling, and felt a kind of
exaggerated wistfulness over loss of mission. It's a small point of
East-West difference that in no way detracts from the entertainment
value of this neat little thriller.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Who or what is a Ronin, you ask?  In somber, slow moving white text on a
black background, a didactic RONIN feels compelled to explain the
definition of its title before it lets the movie begin.  With the
solemnity befitting a religious epic, we learn that in feudal Japan,
Samurai whose liege lords were killed were called Ronin.  Forced to
wander the countryside looking for work, they hired themselves out as
contract killers or as whatever their new employers wanted.
(You'll be glad to know the introduction is little more than a confusing
diversion having scant bearing on the movie at hand.  Although there is
some relevance, it is best ignored.)
John Frankenheimer, who has directed films as intriguingly excellent as
THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE and as laughably awful as THE ISLAND OF DR.
MOREAU, focuses all of his considerable talents for tension on RONIN.
The problem with the movie, however, stems directly from Frankenheimer's
skill as an action director.  He's too adept for his own good.  The car
chases, which are masterfully staged, overwhelm a much better
psychological thriller underneath.  After the one-hundredth car is
demolished in his driving-against-heavy-traffic demolition derby, the
audience is ready to cry "uncle."  Stop already and get back to the
plot.
The story trying desperately to get out is an outstanding character
study of intrigue and double-dealing.  Thanks to David Mamet's rewrite
of J.D. Zeik's original script, the movie pulsates with Mamet's
intelligent brand of terse, enigmatic dialog.  (Mamet writes under the
pseudonym Richard Weisz due to a contract dispute.)
As the movie opens, we meet a group of bad guys who know as little about
what is happening as we do.  An Irish ice goddess, who reveals little
more than her name, Deirdre, has collected five criminals to pull off
some unknown job.  The veteran criminals are strangers who are instantly
leery of each other.
As the organizer, Deirdre, Natascha McElhone from THE TRUMAN SHOW and
MRS. DALLOWAY gives the best performance of her young career.  An
actress who is best when she has to keep her emotions closely in check,
McElhone is perfectly cast for the role.  Her character's coldness makes
her few displays of genuine feelings all the more dramatic, none better
than a brief kissing scene.
The odd assembly of crooks quickly begins to size up each other's
skills.  They even devise subtle tests of their acumen.
As Sam, Robert De Niro is Mr. Caution.  If there's any doubt about a
situation, he stays frozen in his tracks like a deer caught in the glare
of a car's headlights.  But, when he does move, De Niro shows that he
can play a quite credible action hero.
The rest of the team of mutual distrust includes Jean Reno as Vincent,
Stellan Skarsgard as Gregor, Skipp Suddeth as Larry and Sean Bean as
Spence.  The remainder of the ensemble cast is as good as the
principals.  Jonathan Pryce, for example, plays a sinister Irish leader
named Seamus, who has an unstated mission.
The setup for the plot is that the team is supposed to steal a case of
unknown contents, guarded by a group of unknown size, from a yet to be
revealed location at some time in the near future.  The movie is set in
France and features great aerial location shots of Paris and Nice.
In this movie of cross, double-cross, and triple-cross, stealing the
case becomes a child's game of case, case, who's got the case.  The
movie is at its very best when the least is known.  This spirit,
thankfully, is continually recaptured as many facts are found out not be
true after all, leaving the gang to try to rediscover what is happening.
The sparse dialog uses the unspoken word even better the spoken to
advance the storyline.  Even knowing the old adage that there's no honor
among thieves, the movie keeps surprising us.
"No questions, no answers, that's the business we're in," Vincent says
at the end.  This movie's business is as a mysterious thriller, not a
mindless action picture.  With about fifteen minutes of car chases
edited out, the marvelous movie at its core could have gotten out.  As
delivered, it's many outstanding parts are obscured by endless, action
sequences.
RONIN runs 1:58.  It is rated R for violence and profanity and would be
fine for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Dennis Schwartz

RONIN (director: John Frankenheimer; cast: Robert De Niro (Sam), Jean
Reno (Vincent), Natascha McElphone (Dierdre), Stellan Skarsgard
(Gregor), Sean Bean (Spence), Skipp Sudduth (Larry), Michael Lonsdale
(Jean-Pierre), Jonathan Pryce (Seamus), Katrina Witt (Natascha
Kirilova), 1998)
Ronins are the samurais of old Japan who are dishonored because they
failed to protect their master.They roamed the country as bandits and
soldiers of fortune, but still remained loyal to their masters.This
action film takes place in modern France, as a group of secretive older
military types (CIA and Kgb'ers and soldiers of fortune) are likened to
the Ronins. They come together, ala DIRTY DOZEN style, and meet this
taciturn Irish bartender (Natascha) in this  Parisian bar (Paris has a
seedy look to it throughout the film, graffiti is everywhere). She tells
them the minimum details of the plans.The real leader turns out to be
Seamus (Pryce), who chooses to remain in the background. They aim to use
these so-called Ronins  to ambush a well-protected outfit who have in
their possession a steel black case they want retrieved. The filmmaker
chooses to not tell the Ronins or the audience what valuables are in the
case, only that both the Russians and their group (it is implied that
they are IRA) are interested in getting it, and since they don't have
enough money to buy it they are going to steal it.
Sam (De Niro) is ex-CIA; he is in this caper for the money. He is a cool
customer who never panics, and is a natural leader.Vincent (Reno) is the
Frenchman who is Sam's truest friend. Spence (Bean) is the edgy Irish
weapon's man. Larry (Skipp) is the experienced driver. Gregor (Stellan)
is the computer expert and ex-KGB man. This multi-national crew runs
into a series of betrayals; duplicity becomes the norm. There are
outlandish car chases, seemingly trying to outdo other famous film car
chases. Cars go the wrong way on highways, bystanders get gunned down
and cars' crash. One car chase is reminiscent of the Paris tunnel where
Princess Di died, the other the sinewy road Princess Grace had her
fatality on in southern France. Mindless adventure takes hold, and the
story becomes implausible and unimportant. An effort was made to provide
a crisp dialogue, as Mamet, was supposedly the Richard Weisz, who is
mentioned in the credits as the story writer. It was wise of Mamet for
not displaying his own name. Yet there is a sprinkling of good lines and
humor, here and there, enough to make the film mildly diverting, if you
are into watching this film for something else besides the action
scenes.
But despite some attempts to make this a deeper than usual actioner,
Frankenheimer's film is just your typical actioner. What gives it a lift
and a sense of being something more than the thin story it really is, is
the beautiful camera work and moody colors of the cinematography; and,
the superb acting by a very capable cast. Without De Niro's presence
this film would have been less than a run-of-the-mill action film,
despite its excellent cinematography.
I also found that Pryce and  Skarsgard stood out in their villain roles.
And Katrina Witt was a welcome relief from all the hard action scenes.
It was good to watch her perform with grace and beauty on skates. She
played the Russian figure skater who gets shot while performing. It
didn't make sense; but, then again, nothing really made sense in this
film.
Frankenheimer has fallen off the precipice from his glory days of the
'60s and '70s. I admired his MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE (62) and FRENCH
CONNECTION 11 (75) for the raw power of their stories and their keen
insights into his characters' behavior.Unfortunately, this film is not
of the same caliber. It fails to make us think that what is taking place
is anything but absurd; and, that is the shame of it.This once great
filmmaker, in his prime, always seemed to provide us with both
thoughtful and suspenseful films that had some depth to them; while this
film, is at best, only mildly diverting.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
=A9 ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     It would be hard to choose the best American political thriller.
Some people would probably pick THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE and others
(myself included) would pick SEVEN DAYS IN MAY.  Both those films were
tense exercises in chills.  The two films came out within two years of
each other and both were directed by the same man, John Frankenheimer.
But that was 1962 and 1964 respectively.  For most of the rest of his
career Frankenheimer has turned out some decent films, but has shown
little of the promise that those two thrillers showed.  Each of those
films had memorable characters and a tense plot.  They had almost
nothing in the way of chases or gunplay.  The thrills all came from the
plot.  RONIN is like a film made by another man.  Somewhere behind all
the shooting and explosions and car chases there are the rudiments ofa
plot, but we see only tiny pieces of it.  We get a clue here and one
there as to what is going on but J. D. Zeik's screenplay is a bit
obscure.
     The film begins explaining that a ronin is a masterless samurai.
When a samurai has failed in the job of protecting his master from
death, he becomes a ronin, much like a gunfighter in the American West.
If you miss the opening, do not worry.  This film will explain again
what a ronin is.  Sam (played by Robert De Niro) is the modern
equivalent of a ronin.  He is a free agent who seems to have really
good instincts about how to stay alive the world of a professional
killer.  He clearly was in a dangerous business at one time and now he
seems to be drifting around on his own somewhere in France.  Sam is
recruited from a Montmartre bar by Dierdre (Natascha McElhone of THE
TRUMAN SHOW), an Irish woman, to be part of an action to steal a
mysterious metal case.  Dierdre is very tight-lipped about what is in
the case.  Sam joins a team of four others: Vincent (Jean Reno of THE
PROFESSIONAL/LEON and MISSION IMPOSSIBLE), Spence (Sean Bean, TV's
Richard Sharpe, and also PATRIOT GAMES and GOLDENEYE), and Gregor
(Stellan Skarsgard of BREAKING THE WAVES and GOOD WILL HUNTING).  Also
along is Larry (Skipp Suddeth).  The group seems to know their
business, particularly Sam, but each is in his own way cold and
professional with his own field of expertise.  Their only human side
seems to be in tensions among the members of the team.  The story is
not very easy to follow.  It is never clear who is double-crossing whom
and who is working for whom.  Somehow Russians (who may or may not be
the Russian Mafia) and Irish radicals are involved trying to get their
hands on a certain metal case.
     Some very good actors are involved in this film.  One wonders what
they saw in the script.  The characters are mostly one-dimensional
professional killers.  They know their work, and seeing their thought
patterns adds some interest to the film, but for this group deep
feeling between two people is teaming up with another killer so that
neither is killed.  By the end of the film we never really got to know
anybody.  Maybe that is the secret of why such good actors took parts,
since these are not very demanding characters to create.  In addition
to the above characters the film also features Jonathan Pryce and
Michael Lonsdale (the latter of MOONRAKER and of the superior thriller
THE DAY OF THE JACKAL).
     As a revival of a sort of action film that was popular in the
1960s, I was hoping that there would be something here to grab onto and
enjoy.  Unfortunately there are no deep characters, and little to make
us care who eventually ends up with the metal case or why they want it.
I rate RONIN a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
NON-SPOILER: Incidentally, the tale of THE 47 RONIN has been filmed
multiple times, usually under the title CHUSHINGURA or as THE 47 RONIN.
Also one frequently sees in Japanese art the image of a man breaking
down a door with a huge mallet.  This is the first blow of the 47
Ronin.

Author
Matt Williams
Ronin takes the concept of the generic spy thriller to new heights. In
the post-Cold War atmosphere, it doesn't matter who the bad guys are (as
long as they're sufficiently bad), nor who the good guys are (as long as
they're sufficiently good).  Ronin depicts a group of people with
indeterminate motives working for unknown parties to achieve an obscure
goal. It doesn't really matter what the ends are...Ronin is primarily
interested in the means used to get there.  And, surprisingly, given how
little is actually revealed, Ronin turns out to be an impressive
thriller.
As we are informed in some clumsy prologue text: Ronin is the term used
to describe masterless samurai...or in this case disfranchised cold
warriors.  Brought together as sort of a mercenary Mission: Impossible
group, these renegade ex-CIA, ex-KGB, and ex-(insert spy agency here)
agents are assigned an obscure but dangerous task: to retrieve the
ultimate MacGuffin: a mysterious, and heavily guarded, case.  What's in
the case? That information is on a need to know basis only.  Besides,
it's unimportant...all that they (and we) need to know is that many
people are willing to pay a high price (and kill an even higher number
of people) to possess it.
Acting on behalf of the mysterious Seamus (Jonathan Pryce), Dierdre
(Natascha McElhone) draws together a diverse group of ex-spies to
capture the case. Chief among them is Sam (Robert DeNiro), an
experienced agent who is likely ex-CIA, and who has survived on his
well-honed instincts.  Vincent (Jean Reno) is an equipment man, with his
fingers dipped into the black market. Gregor (Stellan Skarsgĺrd), East
German ex-KGB, is an electronics expert, Larry (Skipp Suddeth) is the
expert driver, and Spence (Sean Bean) is a roguish weaponry specialist.
Due to the secrecy involved, we never learn too many details about any
of the gang...much less about their mission.  This is a spy movie
stripped to its barest essentials.  There's no fat here.  You've got car
chases, gun fights, swarms of double crosses and plenty of
intrigue...all without the unnecessary complications of plot or
characterization.  But has some muscle been stripped away as well?
The film thrives on its heart-pounding action sequences, which mostly
live up to their billing.  However, some of the scenes are so intense
that they border on parody.  The casual slaughter of innocents is done
by both good guys and bad, and seems to be mere punctuation to
underscore the seriousness of all involved.  But, at times, the film
seems to draw from the well of excess once too often.
At least there are some good actors at play here...actors so charismatic
that they don't really need strong characters to hold our attention.
DeNiro is simply magnetizing in his portrayal of a desperate ex-spy.
Jean Reno and Stellan Skarsgĺrd are also impressive.  Natascha McElhone
is slightly disappointing, but that is mostly in comparison to the other
great talent here.
Ronin is not a film that you will think upon for days afterward, but
you'll certainly have a good time while you're watching it.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  John Frankenheimer
Cast:  Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Jonathan Pryce, Natascha McElhone,
Stellan Skarsgard, Skipp Suddeth, Sean Bean
Screenplay:  J.D. Zeik, Richard Weisz 
Producers:  Frank Mancuso jr.
Runtime:  118 min.
US Distribution:  MGM/United Artists
Rated R:  strong violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
In recent years, the kingdom of the action film has gone awry.  I'll
admit up front that it's a dubious category to begin with, because, if
you think about it, action films are little more than stylized and
widely-accepted pornography.  I don't look down upon them as a whole,
for there are many that are quite good.  But it seems that most action
films that arise these days are either big, loud, and stupid (The
Avengers), small, timid, and stupid (Mercury Rising), or just plain
stupid (Godzilla).  Here, at last, is a film that doesn't quite fit into
any of these categories.
John Frankenheimer's Ronin (which, despite what the credits say, was
written mostly by David Mamet) is an action film that seems to aspire to
realism and anti-silliness.  It is highly stylized, with some of the
best camera work and car chases I've seen this year, but it's also about
characters and emotions, with Mamet's cynical edge shining through
almost every moment of dialogue.  The film is exciting and always
enjoyable, but it's also thoughtful in a way few action films are (or
even try to be).  Films like this remind me that even pornography can
occasionally pass for art.  
However, the most interesting thing in Ronin is its complete lack of
any story.  It's just about a bunch of international crooks trying to
get their hands on a metal case.  The title of the film refers to a
group of samurai who have lost their master, and roam the countryside
searching for mercenary work; the characters in this film behave much
the same way.  The main character is Sam (Robert De Niro), an American. 
He's a sharp guy, and keeps most of his buddies alive (ah, I love the
jingoistic themes in American action films).  Among his accomplices are
Vincent (Jean Reno), a French guy, Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard) a Russian
guy, and Deirdre (Natascha McElhone), an Irish woman.  
Deirdre, as it turns out, is the one leading the charade, and her boss,
Seamus (Jonathan Pryce), is the one who wants the metal case.  What's in
the case?  Hell if I know.  The metal case is nothing more than a red
herring, and because every single review I've read of Ronin mentions the
fact that we don't get to find out what's in the case, the question
never once surfaced in my mind as I viewed the film.  To be honest, I
don't care what's in the case.  If you think about it, there's probably
nothing in the case, for an empty prop is easier to carry around than
one full of gold or drugs or whatever it could be in the context of the
story.
I've read reviews that discuss Ronin as a "confusing" picture, but
there's no reason to discuss it on a level of coherence or sensibility. 
As I said, the plot is pure McGuffin, and the only thing that will
linger in the memory are the characters and the individual action
scenes.  Frankenheimer is an experienced, skillful director, and Ronin
proves that he hasn't lost anything since he made The Manchurian
Candidate nearly forty years ago.  All the action sequences here -- from
the roaring car chases all the way through the shootouts on
claustrophobic Paris streets -- are fresh and original, and never reek
of derivation or obligatory boredom.  The camerawork in the quiet scenes
is even more noticeably sharp; the best scene in the film has Sam,
wounded with a bullet in the gut, guiding Vincent through the process of
removing the slug with a scalpel and a pair of scissors.  
Frankenheimer's visual style is unique and convincing, so much so that
every scene in the film rises far above the typical perfunctory
execution of most action films.  
On top of all this, Ronin has characters.  Sam is an interesting one,
and De Niro is terrific in the role (though he could play this guy in
his sleep).  What motivates him to do what he does is left largely to
the imagination, but a potent romantic subplot with Deirdre is all we
need for full characterization.  In the female role, the wondrous
McElhone (The Truman Show) is vigorous and engaging.  Reno creates a
pleasant, sympathetic character, while both Skarsgard and Pryce turn in
memorable performances as truly chilling individuals.  What makes all
these people interesting, however, are the dynamics between them -- the
characterization resonates beyond the action film backdrop.
I suppose that real-life action sequences rarely happen in real life. 
Even the ones that I'd call "realistic" are pretty scarce in the real
world.  I've been around twenty years, and I've never seen anything that
might work as a thrilling sequence in an action film.  Ronin, however,
makes itself believable by making the characters shady and interesting,
and by having the action take place in a different country, so the
victims of American pop-culture (such as myself) can observe these
things and say, "Wow, that really can happen in Europe!"  Frankenheimer
and Mamet have created a classic action film here, one that will be
remembered because it's so much less silly than its brethren.  

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Director John Frankenheimer makes us forget about his last disastrous
outing along the fat, old, powder-faced legend of the acting community,
Marlon Brando (THE ISLAND OF DR.MOREAU (5/10)) and hops right into an
old-fashioned espionage/car chase caper starring the always
interesting, Robert DeNiro.
PLOT:
A band of rogue mercenaries are hired by an unknown employer to recover
a mysterious briefcase in France. Unknown to one another, the group
attempt to reach their goal, while constantly keeping an eye on each
other. Lots of car chases through narrow streets, shoot-outs and
double-crossings pepper this lengthy thriller.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting, thrilling, well directed, yet overlong picture features a
couple of excellent car chases, fun shoot-outs, and solid acting. Think
HEAT (8/10) meets THE FRENCH CONNECTION (6/10) in Paris! This film
didn't pack the deepest story line of all time (chase the briefcase
everybody!), but it did manage to keep me entertained through most of
its lengthy sitting, and even sparked some new life into the standard
car chase scenes. I can't truly say that I understood the finale, but
for some reason, it didn't really bother me either. I was quite
entertained by the film, and didn't really mind the semi-puzzling
ending.
DeNiro was cool as a cat, as per his usual method style, and was graced
with some of the hipper lines in this movie (Did you ever kill a guy?
Deniro's response: "No, but I hurt somebody's feelings once.") The rest
of the cast was also pretty solid, with Skarsgĺrd standing out from the
pack. The score of the film also set the right atmosphere, as did the
wonderful cinematography, featuring the wonderful splendor of France.
The only negative points that I recognized in this film could be that
its final resolution was a little ambiguous, and that its run-time was
about twenty minutes too long.
Overall, this film will surely appeal to you if you enjoyed the
previously mentioned HEAT or FRENCH CONNECTION, and will definitely not
disappoint any DeNiro or car chase fans. This year has not been a great
year for thrillers, but RONIN makes sure that it is present when all
names are called. Strap yourself in, learn some French, and get ready
for a bumpy ride!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Screenwriter Richard Weisz is actually the one and f-kin' only, David
Mamet. Apparently, he is responsible for almost the entire screenplay,
but the Writer's Guild of America decided that he had to share credit
with J.D. Zeik, who originated the story, so Mamet elected to go with
the pseudonym instead.
None of the actors in this film were ever told what was really supposed
to be in the briefcase. The actual contents of the case were really
chocolate bars during the filming of this movie. 
The finished project also left 83 cars "injured" after shooting
wrapped.
Ironically, director Frankenheimer also directed the dismal sequel to
THE FRENCH CONNECTION, called THE FRENCH CONNECTION II. Born in New
York and raised in Queens, John always wanted to become a professional
tennis player.
Robert DeNiro is the son of Robert De Niro Snr, an abstract
expressionist, and Virginia Admiral, a painter. He studied acting at
the Actors Studio with Stella Adler and Lee Strasberg. In his 1980
Oscar acceptance speech, Bobby thanked Joey LaMotta, who was at the
time suing United Artists for RAGING BULL's (7.5/10), portrayal of him.
In 1995, he and his girlfriend Toukie Smith had twin sons, conceived by
in-vitro fecundation.
Jonathan Pryce was one of the stars of DARK BLOOD, along with Judy
Davis and River Phoenix but the movie was never released due to
Phoenix's death during filming in 1993.

Author
James Brundage
OK. Here's a movie about five people with fifty guns and unlimited ammo.
Robert de Niro with his pleasant little mole is our friendly neighborhood
ex-CIA mercenary. The mathematician from Good Will Hunting is our favorite
ex-KGB traitor. The guy from The Professional? He's a nice French mercenary,
probably ex-French Secret Service. All of them are killers, all of them
darkly comic and all of them after one thing: a nice steel box which has
something in it that both the IRA and the Russians want.
It's a movie of one-upsmanship: each scene is better than the last. Each car
chase claims more cars, each shootout more lives, each scene, more time.
>From the French countryside to the highway tunnels under Paris, Ronin takes
you, willing or unwilling, along a complex winding plot of people searching
for a mysterious box because of the money not to mention one or two of them
may have an anterior motive.
Somehow, this psychotic inner child has a brain all of its own, coming up
with its own plausibility and interesting traits (not to say it would be
standard without them it's one of the finer action films I've ever seen),
such as the title itself (a Ronin is a Samurai without a master). Then it
turns around and has a car chase that makes Speed look like a little kid on
a scooter. Yeah, come to think of it, it has so much fun shooting this way
and that, it makes any action film look like a kid on a scooter or worse.
Some of them are still learning to walk next to this sweet thing.

Author
David E. Smith
Ronin (1998) - Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone...
   Ronin, noun. In feudal Japan, a samurai warrior without a master,
   operating independently. This was considered dishonorable, and many
   ronin committed ritual suicide.
   "Ronin," noun. A new movie starring Robert De Niro which has very
   little to do with the previous definition.
   Sam (De Niro) is a ronin of sorts, a modern warrior separated from his
   former master, the CIA. His latest job: working with a group of fellow
   fired guns, retrieve a briefcase before it can be sold to the Russian
   mob. Their enigmatic employer (Natascha McElhone) won't tell them
   what's in the briefcase, or even who they're really working for, but
   at least the pay is good.
   Sam's partners in crime include Gregor (Stellan Skarsgaard), a quiet
   electronics whiz; Vincent (Jean Reno), French coordinator; Larry
   (Skipp Sudduth), the designated driver; and Spence (Sean Bean),
   English weapons specialist. Whether CIA, IRA or KGB, each of these
   warriors are ronin in the waning of the Cold War.
   "Ronin" is best described as a thinking man's action film - more time
   is spent on setting up the action than the action itself. A good
   portion of the movie depicts the characters sketching out plans on a
   whiteboard, then carefully executing these plans.
   A real-world mercenary would, of course, need to do this, but in-depth
   planning isn't exactly exciting. The cerebral aspect is emphasized for
   these scenes, and viewers with a bit of patience will appreciate this
   nod to realism.
   De Niro is, as always, excellent. His portrayal of the independent,
   professional, often arrogant Sam is on target - and that's the
   problem. Sam is entirely too detached from his work, making it hard to
   relate to the character. The rest of the cast follows that lead,
   turning in uniformly good performances, but everyone seems distant.
   At long last, though, the action starts, one shoot-out per plot twist.
   It's carefully thought-out, emphasizing the intellectual. Everyone
   relies on his firearms, and people who get shot tend to stay dead,
   just like in real life. The camera work is a bit shaky at times, but
   effective overall. "Ronin" also has an abundance of increasingly
   outrageous car chases, each one expertly executed, even if they strain
   credulity towards the end.
   Like the ronin in the movie, "Ronin" has a veiled master plan. The
   shadowy manipulator in this case is playwright David Mamet (writing
   under a pseudonym), and his influence is evident. The result is a film
   that is intelligent, sharp and worth seeing.

Author
Jerry Saravia
The element of surprise has disappeared in modern action thrillers. We see the
usual thunderous explosions and gunfights bereft of any decent plot or
character exposition. Mostly, we get thrill rides that aim mainly please the
eye, not unlike the summer of 1998's experiment in overkill, "Armageddon."
"Ronin" is not exempt from the aforementioned expectations of your average
action thriller, but it is executed with a finesse in its strategy to thrill us
- it does it without CGI effects or special-effects of any kind. That in itself
is commendable. 
The term Ronin refers to Japanese legend where the Japanese samurai, left with
no leaders to lead them, roamed the countryside acting as warriors-for-hire.
This legend was prominently featured in Akira Kurosawa's great "The Seven
Samurai" and "Yojimbo" - the latter remade as "A Fistful of Dollars." "Ronin's"
version of the story deals with a band of mercenaries who are looking to be
hired, and find work courtesy of an IRA honcho named Deidre (Natascha
McElhone). The job is to obtain a mysterious briefcase, which is in the hands
of "five to eight men." That's the slim plot in a nutshell, and the mercenaries
set out to find the briefcase braving one shootout, car chase and double cross
after another. Who ever said you could trust mercenaries who just want to make
a quick buck? 
The international group of machos includes Sam (played by Robert De Niro), who
may be ex-CIA and has a way with a cup of coffee; a psychotic Russian computer
expert named Gregor (Stellan Skarsgĺrd); a hulking Frenchman named Vincent
(Jean Reno playing virtually the same role as in "Mission Impossible"); and a
very fast driver named Larry (Skip Suduth), who has a way with the narrow roads
and tunnels in Paris (shades of Princess Di's death come to mind). 
"Ronin" could almost be a James Bond thriller considering its numerous
locations (Nice, Paris) and assortment of artillery (machine guns, bazookas),
but it fits more squarely in the tradition of the espionage thriller genre.
Examples of this type of genre extend from Hitchcock's "Sabotage" to "The Day
of the Jackal." "Ronin" is directed by the exciting John Frankenheimer ("The
Manchurian Candidate") and he milks the formula for all the atmosphere and
intrigue you can get. At times, "Ronin" is vaguely European in its steely
attitude and tough-as-nail characters, including the deadly Gregor who has no
qualms of shooting a child in an open playground, or the Irish female leader
who may not be quite what she seems. 
"Ronin" is filled with car chases galore, but it is at its best during its calm
moments, some vaguely humorous. I liked the scene where Sam and Deidre pose as
a couple at a hotel so they can snap shots of one of the "five to eight men." I
thoroughly enjoyed the camaraderie between the members of the group, who size
each other up uncovering one's weaknesses and one's strengths. But there are
two sequences that must be seen to be believed: one is an elaborate setup
involving a Parisian bistro that is as perfectly timed and edited as anything
Hitchcock might have attempted, and the other is when the wounded Sam is giving
instructions to Vincent on how to retract a bullet lodged on his side. This one
sequence features the brilliant British actor Michel Londsdale ("The Bride Wore
Black") as a doctor whose hobby is designing samurai figures.
"Ronin" has too many chase sequences, and a scantily designed plot, but it's
always enticing, breathtaking, and watchable. The cast is watchable, too, and
De Niro's commanding presence (playing an action hero for the first time) and
Frankenheimer's alert direction make up for the brief lapses in plausibility. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Neil Smith
Rating: 81 %
Starring: Robert DeNiro   Jean Reno   Natasha McElhone
Director: John Frankenheimer
After the dismal and complete disaster that was the 'Island of Dr Moreau,
director John Frankenheimer could only do better in his next big screen
effort. Well he has just done that. Ronin is an intriguing , but most of all
a thrilling rollercoaster ride full of twists and turns and on the edge of
your seat excitment. Just like the recent 'Negotiator' I was expecting
another average action movie with the usual explosions and some above
average acting. I was yet again surprised. And I do like surprises.
In Japan, a samurai must protect their master with their lives. The samurai
whose master was killed was a disgrace, and they were forced to wander the
land, looking for work as hired swords or assassins. A masterless warrior
were reffered to as 'ronin'.
We are introduced to an array of enigmatic characters basically covering all
four corners of the earth. We have an Irish contact called Deidre (Natasha
McElhone), an American who has a great deal of knowledge regarding battle
strategies and weapons (DeNiro), an English weapon specialist (Sean Bean), a
French operative (Jean Reno) and another American that is the driver (Skip
Sudduth).
It is set in the post Cold War era. A group of skilled people are hired to
collect a certain mysterious briefcase, which stays a mystery until the end
just like in 'Pulp Fiction'. Nobody is told what it contains or given any
specific details. All the group knows is that it is always guarded by a
group of bodyguards and that it is handcuffed to a man's arm. What they do
know is that the price is high. And they are doing this job only for the
money.
The movie is a wonderful action thriller. Probably the best I have seen in
years. It is a wonderful tourism ad for Paris and Nice, showcasing the
marvellous scenery. I have not seen Europe in all its splendour in a very
long time since Harrison Ford's 'Frantic'. The movies these days only shows
you cities somewhere in America like New York. I know New York so well by
now, and I have not even been there yet. It has some amazing stunts and
action sequences ever. There are two LONG car chasing scenes that is totally
awesome. It is so exciting I did not want it to end. Action , action ,
action all the way.
The performances from the entire cast are all superb. DeNiro(Cape Fear;
Heat) is great as usual. The scene where he guides Jean Reno and his
mysterious friend to help him remove a bullet was quite funny and
convincing. Reno (Godzilla; Professional) is an actor France should be more
proud of more than Gerard Depardieu. He has really made a name for himself
across the globe and especially in Tinsel Town. Natasha McElhone(Truman
Show) as the Irish contact is quite convincing even with her Irish
accent.She is one to watch out for in the future.
In conclusion all I can say is that if you like Die Hard then this is your
movie. Miss it at your own peril.

Author
Nick Amado
Starring: Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone, Stellan
Skarsgard, Jonathan Pryce
After all is said and done, as Vincent (Reno) walks up the steps of a
Paris sidestreet, he mutters to himself "No questions, no
answers. That's the business we're in. Accept it and move on." The
line fits the movie perfectly. As moviegoer, you may have
questions. It is the moviemaker's job to answer them. I had a lot of
questions in Ronin, and none were answered.
Ronin (meaning "masterless samurai") is a convoluted story about Sam
(De Niro) and a band of guns for hire who are asked by Irish
operatives to track and recover a mysterious metal suitcase. What is
in it? Those who know won't tell. Basically, Ronin lumbers on screen
like a large beanbag chair being kicked by a three year old. (I don't
know either, but I like it.) The audience is kept in the dark at the
begining, and remains in the dark through the end. Then the lights
come up in the theater. Ronin seems to be a 2 hour movie that was
constructed around two five minute car chases.
Director John Frankenheimer, a modest man, claimed that his films were
inspirational for Peter Yates's famous "Bullit" car chase and for
William Friedkin's The French Connection chase. The only thing is,
people remember those. No one will remember Frankenheimer's efforts in
Ronin. They are loud, boring chases occasionally interrupted by
gunfire.
In fact, the only things that will keep people from forgetting about
Ronin within the next two weeks are the performances. They are not
extrordinary, but De Niro does a fine job (has he ever been less than
good in a role?) and Reno, McElhone and Skarsgard each do a dandy
supporting turn.
What's more, Elia Cmiral presents a jarring score that reverberates
through the theater, occasionally preventing that dialogue from
getting through. Another contributor to the film is David Mamet. He
stepped in to help doctor the script. What I don't know is if he was
unable to do what he wanted with it, or if he feels he made a decent
screenplay out of it. One thing is for sure, and perhaps it will
answer the question, he used a psuedonym, Richard Weisz. Cant' say as
I blame him.

Author
Michael Redman
The people who completely devote themselves to a leader or a cause live with a
double-edged sword. In one sense their life is easy. They are positive about
what is right and justified in doing anything and everything to achieve their
goal. On the other hand, if that to which they are dedicated disappears, they
are lost, without purpose.
In ancient Japan these rogues were called Ronin. Nowadays they are called
former CIA and KGB agents.
When a Japanese feudal lord was killed, his samurai were masterless and often
roamed the countryside selling their skills to the highest bidders. In
Ronin, after the fall of the Soviet Union, the modern homeless samurai
become criminals-for-hire.
Ex-CIA operative Sam (Robert De Niro) is recruited by comely Irish lass
Deirdre (Natascha McElhone) to help engineer a high jacking. No one knows much
about the job. For Seamus (Jonathan Pryce), an unseen employer with an unknown
motive, he's supposed to steal a metallic box with a mystery content from an
unknowable number of men who are somewhere. Sam doesn't care about the
details: he's in it for the bucks.
In Paris, he's joined by ex-KGB computer expert Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard),
weapons specialist Spence (Sean Bean), driver Larry (Skipp Sudduth) and their
local French connection Vincent (Jean Reno). Slowly they find out more about
their mission but never more than they need to know and often not even that much.
The heist becomes more complex than they expected when they have to race an
unidentified group of Russians to the prize while entangled in betrayal,
double and triple-crosses. The audience rarely knows anything more about what
is going on than do the participants. Like the owls in "Twin Peaks", no one is
what they seem.
In the early sixties, director John Frankenheimer gave us two masterpieces of
political suspense, "The Manchurian Candidate" and "Seven Days In May". This
film doesn't live up to its ancestors, but there are aspects that make a
strong stab at it.
"Ronin" has an odd feel throughout. The colors are severely muted, as if it
were shot entirely at twilight on an extremely hazy day. This lends itself to
an indistinct visual aspect that mirrors the hazy plot. It also makes it look
like a washed-out film from decades ago.
As is to be expected in action films, there are plenty of car chases, but they
are the strangest that I can remember. Even though there are explosions and
wrecks galore as a shoot-out takes place racing against traffic on an
expressway, they are remarkably unspectacular. 
Huge trucks overturn and explode, but they're only onscreen for a second. Cars
flip over and over but are only seen out of the corner of your eye. This is
contrary to the current style of focusing on the disasters, seeing them over
and over from different points of view. Although this imparts a participatory
feeling to the action -- after all, if you're in a speeding car you're not
going to spend a lot of time looking in the rear view mirror -- there's a lack
of spectacle which leaves the audience wanting something with a little more oomph.
There's a coldness to the characters that doesn't allow us to get to know any
of them very well. This makes some sense as people in their particular
profession can't afford to let too much out or get very involved. But this
prevents the audience from caring much about them. The one time where the
detachment does work well is when Sam kisses Deirdre to fool passing police.
The ice princess' passionate response has more impact because it is the only
time during the movie that she lets loose with any emotion.
Sam's friendship with Vincent is one of the few human relationships in the
film. Although they know little about each other, they bond out of necessity,
trusting each other with their lives. In the world of the Ronin, you take it
where you can get it but you also know that the next time you meet up, you
might be on opposite sides.
The success of the film lies mostly in the strength of the actors. De Niro is
always a master on screen. His weary but dedicated Sam is exactly what he
should be. Although he's made some questionable choices in his career
("Mission Impossible", "Godzilla"), Reno has a face and presence made for
movies. He's the tough guy that you want to like. The rest of the players are
equally up to the task although you'll find yourself desiring a bit more warmth.
The script, by an uncredited David Mamet, is nothing exceptional but his short
repetitive style fits well in the mouths of the men without a past or future.
The Nice streets and French countryside offer plenty to look at and provide a
picturesque backdrop to the story.
Although it only runs two hours, the film seems long. The car chases are
excessive and become tiresome after a while. Some of them could have been left
on the cutting room floor to leave room for character development.
The end of the cold war resulted in a calmer world, but after seeing "Ronin",
you are left to wonder how many of these loose cannons are running around out
there. I suppose they'll find new masters in time. Let's hope that they end up
working for the good guyswhoever the good guys are.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and is currently
soaking his feet after the Lotus Festival experience. Congratulations to all
involved in one of the best events that Bloomington has to offer.
Redman@indepen.com will probably get important electrons to him.)
[This appeared in the 10/1/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Steve Kong
In Japanese legend, a ronin was a samurai whose lord was killed. Left with
no one to protect and ashamed that he let his master die, a ronin wandered
the countryside often as a killer for hire, or a thief. In John
Frankenheimer's Ronin, we meet a band of modern-day ronins.
In a small café in Paris we meet these ronins Sam the American (Robert De
Niro) who to our knowledge is ex-CIA, or at least he says he is; Vincent
(Jean Reno) from France who is the team's "tour guide"; computer expert
Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard) from Russia; from England, weapons expert Spence
(Sean Bean); and master driver Larry (Skipp Sudduth) from America.
Deidre (Natascha McElhone), who is under the control of a mysterious man,
has brought this international team of "ronins" together. Deidre is told to
get together this team in order to steal a suitcase. What's in the
suitcase? We don't know. The suitcase is just a McGuffin - or as Alfred
Hitchcock, the man who coined this term, defines as an object that we are
all focused on, but it really doesn't matter what it is.
For the rest of the movie we follow this team of ronins on their quest to
get back the suitcase. We go from shootouts to car chases to shoot outs and
back to car chases. If this sounds tedious to you, it is not. I'm sure this
repetition would have failed under the hands of a beginner and untalented
director, but under the steady hands of John Frankenheimer, it works out
really well.
I lost count of shootouts but there were three spectacular chases. Some
might argue that three chases in one movie is two too many. But, these car
chases are technically brilliant - the logistics of putting three of them
together must have been a nightmare. From the tight and fast driving in the
claustrophobic and anemic streets of Paris to the weaving and avoiding
oncoming traffic, these car chases are the staples for Ronin.
The shootouts get the adrenaline pumping with the zings and whizzes of
bullets flying all around. There's nothing like watching Robert De Niro
wielding an M-60 and taking out faceless bad guys in a tight alleyway. The
sound design for this movie is fully enveloping. For example, there is a
scene where one of the ronins is being beat up in a backroom. As the camera
pans to another character, we hear the punches and grunts swirl around to
the right rear. I turned my head backward to see if it was an audience
member grunting or if it was a sound effect. Kudos to the sound design team.
Writers J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz (pseudonym for David Mamet) put
together a script that keeps us wondering who can and can't be trusted. The
plot for Ronin is not strong - a bunch of guys look for a suitcase - but it
is enough for Frankenheimer to wrap his action around. 
It's hard not to compare Ronin with Mission: Impossible. Both Ronin and
Mission: Impossible are about a band of spies who have lost their jobs and
are out to steal something. Where Mission: Impossible failed is in the
action and plot. Mission: Impossible's plot was too tangled to enjoy and
the action was thin at best. Had Mission: Impossible, like Ronin, had a
strong script and director behind it, it would have turned out to be a much
better movie.
The actors in Ronin give stand-out performances. How could they not? These
are top-notch actors. Robert De Niro gives an outstanding performance as
Sam. His portrayal of Sam is as an overly cautious man who is willing to
take calculated risks. In one scene, De Niro gives the perfect bite to a
line. After talking another ronin into taking a bullet out of himself, De
Niro calmly says, "You think you can stitch me up on your own? If you don't
mind, I'm going to pass out."
Jean Reno is a great actor who is sometimes squandered - look at how his
talents are wasted in Mission: Impossible and Godzilla. When given the
chance to perform, Reno shines. His character of Vincent is a tough
Frenchman who is loyal to the people that he can trust. Reno gives an
outstanding performance as Vincent.
Bean, Skarsgard, and McElhone all give good performances. Skarsgard, who
was the caring teacher in Good Will Hunting, is vicious in Ronin. It was
funny to see German ice skater Katerina Witt in Ronin as a Russian ice skater.
I haven't seen any of John Frankenheimer's (The Manchurian Candidate) films
other than Ronin. After seeing Ronin, I will be renting Frankenheimer's
older works to see more of his style. Frankenheimer definitely has a style,
gritty and realistic. He also has a mastery of putting together
edge-of-your-seat moments. Something to note Frankenheimer recently won an
Emmy for directing the cable TV movie George Wallace.
Worth mentioning is Elia Cmiral's score for Ronin that builds a lot of
tension during the film.
Ronin is a white-knuckle thriller. It kept me at the edge of my seat for
the full running time and had me flinching during the action sequences. The
plot for Ronin is much like the suitcase, it's something that we care
about, but don't know anything about. It would have been nice to have a
little more plot - but, with a talented director behind the script we
forget about the paper-thin plot. Don't Miss Ronin. Ronin makes some of the
action movies of the summer look like dramas.

Author
Susan Granger
Susan Granger's review of "RONIN" (United Artists/MGM)
Despite the pretentious opening statement which informs us:
"In feudal Japan, the warrior class of samurai were sworn to protect
their liege lords with their lives. Those samurai whose liege was
killed suffered great shame and...were no longer referred to as
samurai...such men were called Ronin," motor vehicle action is what
obsesses director John Frankenheimer who, earlier in his career,
helmed "Grand Prix" and "French Connection II."  Set not in feudal
Japan but in contemporary France, the characters are scruffy, cynical
veterans of the Cold War who, after the dissolution of the Eastern
Bloc, have become mercenaries. They're hardly "The Magnificent Seven"
or "The Dirty Dozen," but they'd like to be. There's Robert De Niro,
an ex-CIA operative; Frenchman Jean Reno; an ex-KGB electronics and
surveillance expert, Stellan Skarsgard; Sean Bean, a weapons whiz; and
Skipp Sudduth, a hotshot driver. Recruited individually by Natascha
McElhone, as a cool, close-mouth'd Irishwoman, they're assigned to
steal a mysterious suitcase so that the Irish can have its contents
before it's sold to a group of rich Russians. But what starts as a
simple ambush-and-assault turns into a series of double-crosses and
bloody betrayal, eventually leading them to an international ice show,
where Katarina Witt is stalked by a sniper in a scene reminiscent of
Frankenheimer's "The Manchurian Candidate." The complex and often
confusing screenplay is by J.D. Zeik and "Richard Weisz", a pseudonym
allegedly concocted by David Mamet because he did not want to share
screen credit. And, worst of all, the film ends without ever coming to
a satisfying conclusion. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10,
"Ronin" is a chaotic 6. It's car chases, stunts and carnage in search
of a story.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
RONIN
Cast: Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone, Stellan Skarsgard,
Sean Bean, Skipp Sudduth, Jonathan Pryce, Michael Lonsdale, Katarina
Witt
Director: John Frankenheimer
Screenplay: J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
The plot of Ronin relies heavily on a valuable briefcase.  As in Pulp
Fiction, the contents of this briefcase are never revealed, for the
simple fact that what is inside of it is insignificant to the film's
overall meaning.   The briefcase is a tool - or, if you like, an
excuse - to give characters the chance to entertain us.  That theory
pretty much works with all that Ronin has to offer.  Director John
Frankenheimer (who has had more than forty years of experience in the
field) sacrifices a potentially powerful film for the sake of
individual, insignificant moments.  Ordinarily that might work in a
simplistic action flick, but in one that tries to tell as much as Ronin
does, success is somewhat limited.
On paper, Ronin certainly has all the assets of a great action film.
The past has proven that great action films often do not have great
action stars, but rather, solid dramatic actors having a little fun in
slightly easier roles.  The gripping crime saga Heat positioned Al
Pacino alongside Robert DeNiro, and equally peculiar combinations were
found in Face/Off (John Travolta and Nicholas Cage) and The Negotiator
(Samuel L. Jackson, Kevin Spacey).  I was pleased to see DeNiro and Jean
Reno (two actors who have proven that they can do more than just look
tough, which they do pretty well anyway) form a solid partnership,
although they end up twiddling their thumbs with too much screen time
and too little to do.
An international team of covert operatives are hired to retrieve a
mysterious briefcase.  The smart and smug Sam (Robert DeNiro) becomes
the obvious leader of the group.  When asked if he had ever killed
anybody, Sam answers "once I hurt somebody's feelings."  The other
operatives are French coordinator Vincent (Jean Reano), driver Larry
(Skipp Sudduth), weapons specialist Spence (Sean Bean, best known for
his role as 006 in Goldeneye) and hi-tech gadgets specialist Gregor
(Stellan Skarsgard).  Holding the team together is employer Deirdre
(Natasha McElhone), who is equally as cold as the people working for
her.
Ignore the stylish backdrops and sophisticated European settings - Ronin
makes little sense.  Its screenplay by J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz
sprouts various developments, ranging from betrayal to even a hint of
romance.  There's a surprise bad guy, another surprise bad guy, a good
guy, another good guy, a coward, and so forth.  Before Ronin develops
its primary characters, more characters are introduced.  Before Ronin
allows us to absorb the seriousness of its scenarios, another one is on
the way.  This makes for tense and often gripping moments, but I feel
that the film would have benefited from a little more breathing space.
Enemy of the State staged a similar intensity, but this was done
intentionally and intelligently, whereas Ronin seems to try too hard to
keep viewers on the edge of their seats.
Frankenheimer deliberately refrains from developing his central
characters.  You will walk away from Ronin not knowing much about who
they are or what motivates them, with the exception of some minor
details (Sam is there purely for the money, that's for sure).  For the
most part, the coldness and bitterness of the film's relationships work
on exactly the right levels.  Even when Sam and Vincent develop a loyal
friendship, you get the feeling that something is holding them back.
Their professionalism is unshakable; if one saves the life of the other,
their initial reaction is not to show their appreciation, but to return
the favor.  DeNiro and Reno give convincing performances in the most
likeable parts, and the bittersweet supporting cast get their moments to
shine.
In a silly little voice over at the film's completion, Frankenheimer
almost seems to be asking us not to condemn his film for its lack of
emotion.  Whilst I appreciated the way Ronin captures the spirit of the
killer for hire industry, Frankenheimer spells it out to us in big
bright letters, rather than allowing viewers to walk away with a
personal interpretation as to how it works.  The industry is cold.  C -
O - L - D.
"A thinking man's action pic" is the general description that many have
given this film. My two cents says that its creators certainly did think
about what they were doing, but tried to make too much out of too
little.  Ronin certainly has many rewarding moments (including a couple
of eye popping chase scenes), and a handful of performances of an
unusually high standard.  But Frankenheimer never lets his settings or
characters come alive in the way they should have.  Not only does he
sacrifice a potentially powerful film for the sake of some exciting
moments, but also a wide range of intriguing characters for a wide range
of inaccessible ones.


Author
Pierce Dalton
 It is also a very slick, imaginative, thrilling film from director John
Frankenheimer, whose 1996's film, Island of Dr. Moreau, left little to be
desired.
 The plot involves a bunch of international operatives (some ex-KGB) joining
together to steal a briefcase away from a very powerful and wealthy man.
 What's in the briefcase we don't know.  Neither does Sam (Robert De Niro), the
so-called leader of the operative group.
 If you're thinking that bit resembles Pulp Fiction, you're not alone.
 Tailing the briefcase all over Europe, Sam and his elite group (including Jean
Reno) set up all kinds of booby traps and whatnots to trap the man and
briefcase. The film has a sort of James Bond feel to it, yet, generates more
energy from its action sequences than any 007 film I have seen, including
1997's Tomorrow Never Dies.
 De Niro and Reno work great together.  They have that rare flare for acting
that never goes stale, even in the midst of a film like Ronin, which, if you
get right down to it, is very intelligent, atmospheric, and dopey.
 One thing that really heightens the film to intensity are its spectacular car
chase scenes.  They are among the best I have seen.
 A long drawn-out one, featured in the now-famed tunnel where Princess Diana
died in Paris, is a dizzying, frenzied, pure rush or energy.
 Director Frankenheimer has abandoned Moreau's Island and created a very sassy
thriller, and some breathtaking views, in Paris and Rome.
 Do Sam and the gang capture the briefcase?
 You'll never look at a car the came again.

Author
Edwin Jahiel
RONIN ** Directed by John Frankenheimer. Written by J.D. Zeik and Richard
Weisz. Sory by Zeik. Photography, Robert Fraisse. Editing Tony Gibbs.
Production design, Michael Z. Hanan.
Music, Elia Cmiral. Produced by Frank Mancuso, Jr.. Cast:  Robert De Niro
(Sam), Jean Reno (Vincent), Natascha McElhone (Deirdre), Stellan Skarsgard
(Gregor), Sean Bean (Spence), Skipp Sudduth (Larry), Michael Lonsdale
(Jean-Pierre),Jonathan Pryce (Seamus), et al. A Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer
release. 121 minutes. R (violence, self-surgery)
If you're reading this, the first thing that catches your eye is the **
rating. It is sadly low for those who, like me, know and appreciate much of
John Frankenheimer's "oeuvre."
Frankenheimer  (now 68) was big in the 1960s,  with a succession of
notable, often great movies including Birdman of Alcatraz; the political,
paranoid cult-thriller The Manchurian Candidate; the political conspiracy
thriller Seven Days in May; the WWII Resistance adventure The Train; the
affecting melodrama of skydivers, The Gypsy Moths; the haunting, chilling,
humanistic sci-fi Seconds, and arguably the best film starring Rock Hudson.
By the 1970s Frankenheimer had crested but still made some gems: The Iceman
Cometh; the sequel French Connection II -- which my minority opinion rates
above the original French Connection;  Black Sunday, a suspenseful,
intelligent entry in the terrorist sub-genre. Then came a decidedly mixed
bag, although when Frankenheimer returned to television in the 90s, he did
very well with TV features (Andersonville, The Burning Season, George
Wallace). On the big screen he stumbled in 1996 with the ludicrous yet
campy The Island of Dr. Moreau.
In Ronin he shows an amount of pizazz that would put most younger
filmmakers to shame, but he does not add the wisdom, logic and
thoughtfulness that ought to come with age and experience. A combination of
The Dirty Half-Dozen, Mission Improbable and flicks of older decades, this
movie-movie belongs to what might be called "Explosive American Cinema,"
all action and no substance.
A bunch of mostly older, experienced mercenaries -- the old "motley group"
cliché-- is hired by  Deidre, a young Irish woman, to recover a case, a
metal thing like those used by photographers to carry their cameras in. The
(too) atmospheric beginning in a  (too) seedy Paris cafe gives no clue as
to who is who, what is what, whose orders Deirdre is passing on. This
murkiness will prevail throughout the picture. In bits and pieces we get
vague crumbs of information about the "motley group" (itself an old
cliche), none about anyone's (on all sides) psyches, motivations, and zero
about contents of the case. The soldiers of fortune (if this is what they
are) are of various nationalities (not all of them clear), individually
specialize in this or that, may or may not be renegades or operatives of
such outfits as the CIA, the KGB,the IRA...One man handles complicated (and
probably not yet invented)  computer stuff that tracks cars which whoosh by
at the speed of rockets.
"Less is more" is a wise formula, but less can also be less, as here, while
"more is more" (overkill, as here, in the action) is  always definitely
less, a handicap. When the action gets going, man, does it go!  Never
flagging for a moment, the chasers and the chased (who are also mysterious,
undefined types) shoot it up, then shoot some more (both en masse and
individually), then yet more, and get involved in triple,quadruple, perhaps
even quintuple crosses.
Above all, there are endless car chases that take us from Paris to the
Riviera and back. It is painfully clear that Frankenheimer is out to beat
all records of vehicular movie pursuits, such as those in Bullitt, among
others, and especially in French Connection I which was directed by
Willliam Friedkin, the man who in 1985 tried to top himself with To Live
and Die in L.A. Here Frankenheimer comes up with a movie in contemporary
settings but in the spirit of actioners of past decades.
The South of France, the scene of incredible mayhem, is also shown in a
colorful (and genuine) way that ought to make French  Tourist Offices
recommend that the filmmakers be awarded the Legion of Honor. We go from
the Hotel Majestic in Cannes to the Corniche--the sinuous mountain highway
by the sea where Princess Grace of Monaco had her fatal accident. (Later,
the whizzing within Parisian car tunnels recalls Princess Diana's demise).
We go, always with guns and bazookas blazing whilst the cars bounce off
civilian property, through villages, Mediterranean resorts, the city of
Nice. What happens in the streets of Nice has to be seen to be believed. In
fact, the more it is seen the less it is believed. How the chasers and the
chased elude each other, how too little and too late the cops are, how so
few pursuers, pursued, innocent Nicois and others are killed or maimed,
beggars the imagination. But since, already quite early into the movie
imagination has been so anesthetized, it plays no role.
The Duels in the Sun continue in the city of Arles (170 miles west of
Nice), mostly in the old Roman Arena where the opposing sides, made
increasingly confusing, fight it out mano a mano as well as group vs.
group. By now Frenchman Jean Reno and American Robert De Niro are pals but
still keep their secrets. Somewhere near the return road to Paris, Reno
takes his wounded friend to the country house of mysterious (read:
illogical and undefined) Michael Lonsdale who is not a doctor, but has all
sorts of surgical equipment which he does not know how to use. So De Niro
operates on his own self. It's all done with mirrors, literally.
In Paris, more dumbness takes place.How fast the searchers locate the
Russian Mafia re-boggles the non-mind, for example), and exploits,
coincidences, and more get complicated by a traitor, the Russian Mafia, and
an ice-skating show starring "Natacha Kirilova." She is played by the
real-life German (made Russian here) Olympic champion Katarina Witt whose
gyrations provide the only --and unplanned-- sexy moments of the movie.
After she is shot dead by a sniper (don't ask) and the other side  (don't
ask either) gets hold of the precious case, AND there is another
double-crossing, AND unexplained persons come and go, De Niro gives a 100%
unbelievable car chase all over Paris at Mach II speeds, destroying in the
process chunks of the city and a fleet of innocent automobiles.
The breathless action is a single-minded series of messes on top of
unexplained and inexplicable messes. And we never do find out what's in the
case. Think of Luis Bunuel's Belle de Jour and the mysterious box that a
Korean client brings to a high-class brothel -- but then, Bunuel had a
teasing sense of humor and mockery that "Ronin" lacks. The case may be like
Alfred Hitchcock's MacGuffins, but "Ronin" is light years away from
Hitchcock's clean story lines, his humor and mischievousness, the richness,
fascination  and humanity of his characters.
A text that opens the movie tells us that in feudal Japan, those masterless
samurai who wandered the land and hired themselves out as swords or
bandits, were known as Ronin. Later there is some verbal elaboration of the
legend (from fact) of "The Loyal 47 Ronin" which was made into a filmic
two-part classic (1941, 1942) by Kenji Mizoguchi. But "Ronin" hardly fits
those references.
Frankenheimer's movie is another case of the desperate attempts to find
something to replace the Cold War duels that sustained action flicks over
decades. There's no doubt that "Ronin" has excellent technical values and
great photography, that its performers are mostly striking within the
limitations of their one-dimensional roles. But the human side is absent,
the dialogue minimal and unrevealing, the entire thing a mindless
tour-de-force. Its writer J.D.Zeik is a first-timer. David Mamet was called
in as script doctor and rewrote most of the scenario as "Richard Weisz."
Doctor Mamet should have healed himself.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Author
Victory Marasigan
Review by Victory A. Marasigan
http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~vmaras1/reviewsidx.html
The Ronin were a group of shamed samurai in feudal Japan who sold their
services after the death of their slain master.  With _Ronin_ (**1/2),
director John Frankenheimer and writers J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz
attempt a modern-day take on the concept, but whatever historical
comparison they intended to make seems to have been lost in all the noise
and spectacle of what is an otherwise enjoyable distraction of a movie. 
The Ronin in this tale are a group of mercenaries who have been assembled
to retrieve a silver suitcase somewhere in France.  The operatives are
strangers to each other and to their employer, and don't even know the
contents of the case they are chasing after.  This premise is intriguing,
but the movie quickly reveals itself for the high-class escapist junk
we've already seen in umpteen James Bond movies.
To make up for the deficits in character and plotting, Frankenheimer
throws in some excellent high-speed car chases, arguably the best thing
about the movie. The labyrinthine streets of France become the world's
biggest Hot Wheels Playset, complete with statuesque roundabouts, loopy
turns, and of course, bins full of seafood for the smashing. These
sequences, showcasing grand cityscapes and killer mountain roads, are
deftly executed adrenaline rushes, at least worthy of your local
second-run theater's admission price. 
It is to Robert DeNiro's credit that he is able to block our view of the
derivative story line on his own for about half an hour before we begin to
suspect something is afoot. As the shadowy soldier-of-fortune Sam, DeNiro
is charismatic and cool, able to assault someone with something as simple
as a strategically-placed cup of coffee.  By necessity and by design, Sam
assumes the role as the group's strategist, uniting the ragtag bunch into
a competent team.
The other Ronin are not quite as well-drawn.  Natascha McElhone (_The
Truman Show_), as a former terrorist, is the next most interesting member
of the group, displaying a dichotomy of toughness and sensitivity.  Actors
Sean Bean(_Goldeneye_) and Jean Reno (_The Professional_) fill out the
rest of the team with vivid, if routine, performances.  As their icy
nemeses, fine thespians Jonathan Pryce and Stellan Skarsgard seem to serve
no purpose except to stuff the roster with more actors with foreign
accents.  The film stifles the acting skills of most of its talent, then
commits the unforgivable offense of asking the audience to sit back and
accept the characters' lack of knowable motivation or sympathizability.
The writers have gone through the conceit of making their story as layered
as possible, but alas, the facade is all too transparent.  "Intelligent" 
appears to have been confused with "incomprehensible," as _Ronin_ jumps
from one scene to the next without quite making clear what was so
important about the scene before. The questions pile up, only to be wiped
away cleanly by another exhilarating car chase which literally kills off
those loose ends.  A warning to the unsuspecting movie-goer: any attempt
to sort out who is loyal to whom in this story may cause severe cerebral
hemorrhage.  Don't think.  Just wait for the car chases. 
Rather than give us too little opportunity for introspection (as is the
case in many modern films), _Ronin_ gives us too much, so that the overall
scheme of the film resembles nothing so much as a box bull of blank jigsaw
puzzle pieces. 

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
John Frankenheimer's films are always perplexing.  They have a sharp yet
ordinary look to them and they still manage to entertain highly.
Frankenheimer's (and Frank Sinatra's) 'The Manchurian Candidate' from
1962 is perhaps the best espionage thriller ever made and
Frankenheimer's work as director on other films such as 'Birdman of
Alcatraz' (1962), 'Grand Prix' (1966), the disappointing but well
meaning 'The French Connection II' (1975) and 'Black Sunday' (1977) have
put him in an important light in the chapters of film history.
Frankenheimer doesn't always like to use a lot of music in his films
because his gripping plot lines can sing a different tune.
'Ronin' is a film that makes Robert De Niro look great.  His character
is an enigma and De Niro plays it exactly that way.  We assume that he
is or has been some sort of covert operator earlier in his life who is
now working in Europe with a group of others in the same business who
are all of different nationalities.  There is the Frenchman (Jean Reno)
who De Niro strikes up an off beat friendship with.  An Irish woman
(Natascha McElhone) and her companion (Jonathan Pryce), an ex-KGB
computer whiz (Stellan Skarsgard), a weapons specialist (Sean Bean) and
the group's driver (Skipp Sudduth).
They're all working together to obtain a mysterious steel suitcase which
contains something worth killing for and before its sold to a group of
high bidding Russians, the attempts to get it make for the film's best
action sequences.  The film's beginning and first half hour are
extremely simple and Frankenheimer turns the heat up slowly, comparable
to watching a pot of water boil on your stove.  Slow but worth the
wait.  The rhythm the film has is genuine in all its clever little
tidbits as the little things in this film truly count as much as the big
things do.
Exquisite European photography is the setting as Paris is the film's
central focus for the story and Frankenheimer uses his camera like a
bullet at times and stretches every action sequence's tension out to its
fullest extent.
De Niro's early work in the movies looked extremely low-key.  His
performances in 'The Godfather Part II' (1974) and 'Taxi Driver' (1976)
had De Niro doing a lot of method acting without a lot of emotion in his
roles, sort of like Gary Cooper.  Both of those actors and their subtle
ways actually had great strength.  Certainly, those roles were much
different than De Niro's roles in 'The King of Comedy' (1983) and 'Cape
Fear' (1991) where De Niro never did let up with those "in your face"
type of performances. 'Ronin' is vintage De Niro.  A film where De Niro
can give a good, low-key performance while giving the rest of the cast
their fair share of the spotlight and a film where director John
Frankenheimer can still exhibit his style as one of film's best
espionage directors.  A style that along with De Niro's, works for all
generations.
Visit the new home of FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: September 25, 1998
Starring: Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Jonathan Pryce, Natascha McElhone,
Stellan Skarsgard, Sean Bean, Katarina Witt
Directed by: John Frankenheimer
Distributed by: Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer
MPAA Rating: R (strong violence, some language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/ronin.htm
There exists a litany of differences between a successful action movie
and a successful suspense movie. Action movies are typically devoid of
plot other than a simple byline which can string together several
explosive sequences, while suspense movies hinge on plot and subtlety
and the ability to bring everything full-circle. For fans of both
genres, however, realism is key. Action fans want to know that the
weapons and methods their heroes are using are authentic, and suspense
fans want everything to fall into an explainable framework by the
movie's end. On this advice, Director John Frankenheimer (THE ISLAND OF
DR. MOREAU) strives for realism in an interestingly dynamic balance of
suspense and action for his latest thriller, RONIN. 
The depth of intrigue in RONIN is quite amazing, considering the fare
that's fallen into the same category over the last few years. The
script, written by J.D. Zeik in his big-screen debut, approaches levels
of complexity that had people spinning away from MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE two
years ago. A certain number of people will be lost by this, but
afficianados will appreciate it all the more and return multiple times.
Frankenheimer masters the script with poise, and tells us a dark but
stoically realistic tale of a group of post-Cold War mercenaries working
to earn their paycheck. His ability to convey feeling and character
while promoting explosiveness and tense atmosphere works well here, and
RONIN becomes a better movie because of it. 
Robert De Niro headlines this cast of noteworthies in a performance that
is the most outstanding of his in quite some time. He takes command and
offers much gravity as the ex-spy Sam, a man who's called to France to
help a shady operations controller named Dierdre (Natascha McElhone)
recover a package. The package becomes the central motivator for the
entire cast, especially once the requisite double-crossing begins, and
its role is skillfully penned by Zeik. At times, however, Zeik's tale
becomes almost too reminiscent of MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE - De Niro might
easily become Tom Cruise, the package might become Cruise's computer
disk. Fortunately, the focus here is almost entirely on the package,
whereas in MISSION the script was more concerned with the double-cross
and why it happened. 
The action content is impressive, and it lives up to the hints given in
previews. The only fans who will be disappointed are those who expect
full-blown combat scenes and instead are forced to suffer through
moments of slowness. RONIN does take a degree of intelligence to follow
all of the nuance from start to finish, but even the uninitiated will be
able to keep a grasp on most characters mand subplots. The suspense
tapers off considerably by the end, a bit of a drawback because of its
height at the movie's open. Considering these factors it's good to see
that RONIN was a project that turned out well, and it's another good bet
this month. Since quality is usually sparse during the early fall
months, it's definitely worth the visit.

Author
Ryan Davis
        If you have ever seen Fox TV's special car chase programs, you'll
have a good idea about the content of Ronin, the new action "thriller" from
director John Frankenheimer.
        The film involves a mysterious briefcase, that several groups of
terrorist want to get their hands on.  An Irish women, Dierdre (played by The
Truman Show's Natascha McElhone), hires a group of mercenaries to assist her
in getting the briefcase. Among the people she hires are Sam (Robert De
Niro), Vincent (Jean Reno), and Gregor (Stellan Skarsgĺrd from Good Will
Hunting). Dierdre's  groups assignment is too seize the briefcase while the
current owners are transporting it. They accomplish this task, but a traitor
is in the bunch and the briefcase is soon on the run again.
        The briefcase stays on the run, as the movie leads the viewer through
several  plot twists that are badly executed. The writer seemed to be
attempting to make a smart action movie, but failed to understand that just
because there are surprises, it doesn't add too the credibility of a senseless
script. The plot twists get no reaction because they come at a time where no
one cares what is going on, after the apparent climax of the film.
        But to add to the excitement, as I mentioned earlier, there are endless
car chase scenes. They are unrealistic and fail to add anything to the story.
Don't get me wrong, I love car chases, but they were overdone and too long
here.
        We never do find out what's in the briefcase, but I doubt anyone cares
by the time they finish sitting through this two hour long attempted thriller.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 United Artists
 Director: John Frankenheimer
 Writer: J.D. Zeik, Richard Weisz
 Cast: Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone,
Stellan Skarsgard, Sean Bean, Skipp Sudduth, Michael
Lonsdale, Jan Triska, Jonathan Pryce
   If Akira Kurosawa, the late great Japanese director, looked
down from his Kyoto-in-the-sky at "Ronin," would he be
pleased?  Now, "Ronin" takes place in contemporary France,
not in medieval Japan, and deals with a band of post-Cold
War adventurers, but John Frankenheimer's latest movie has
mythic dimensions.  The name "Ronin" is explained in the
film's opening statement: "In feudal Japan, the warrior class of
samurai were sworn to protect their liege lords with their lives.
Those samurai whose liege was killed suffered great shame,
and were no longer referred to as samurai.  Such men were
called Ronin."  
   The Ronin in director John Frankenheimer's new movie are
contemporary warriors thrown out of their regular jobs with the
ending of the Cold War.  They no longer feel a loyalty toward
their masters in the Eastern bloc or the IRA, the KGB or the
CIA.  They are alienated by the lack of familiar structure and
now work only for money, except that they still glory in doing
a professional job for the highest bidder.  These Ronin
include a munitions expert, a master driver and a skilled
tactician.  So then, would Kurosawa like what he sees? 
Probably not.  His powerful action movie "The Seven
Samurai" about a Sixteenth Century village which hires
combatants to fend off bandits never sacrificed clarity in the
interest of artistry.  By contrast "Ronin" is not only convoluted:
it seems to boast its confused plot as a metaphor for the
bewilderment felt by these modern warriors who lack all
political loyalties.  Money is the name of the name, not
allegiance to the old masters.  The six men do not know who
is funding their operation and while the woman who is paying
them knows the identity of her boss, she hasn't the foggiest
why her employer is so eager to take possession of a metal
case.  She does not know what's in this case, her band of a
dirty half-dozen hasn't the foggiest idea, and when the movie
ends, neither does the audience.  But then, moviegoers spent
fruitless months discussing what was in the briefcase sported
in "Pulp Fiction."  It matters not that we're kept in the dark
about the contents, only that we're assured the material is
valuable enough to have people kill or die to get it.  What
would be helpful might be some clue about the tangled
scheme of double-dealing that pervades the story as first one
member of the team then another and yet a third betray the
squad to gain all the riches for themselves.  These
motivations are sacrificed so that Frankeheimer--whose
"Manchurian Candidate" scored in 1962 as the year's best
paranoid thriller--could simply serve up a glut of car chases
and standard-issue shootouts.  
   The team of modern, shamed samurai include Sam (Robert
De Niro), formerly a CIA operative who claims to be working
because he needs the money.  He is no gung-ho adventurer
but rather a guy who is teased by a colleague with the query
"Are you worried about saving your own skin?"  "Yeah," is his
honest reply, "It covers my body."  His #1 buddy, Vincent
(Jean Reno), is a Frenchman who may have given so much
attention to learning English that he still has not found the
time to shave.  Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard) looks so sinister
that you can probably guess he will betray the lot while
Spence (Sean Bean) and Larry (Skipp Sudduth) have their
special jobs to perform but are of minimal benefit to the plot.
Deirdre (Natascha McElhone), however, emerges as the most
engaging person in the narrative.  An icy operative who gives
the orders and pays the money, she appears too armored to
have a romantic interest; yet when Sam pretends to kiss her
to avoid notice by the passing police, she responds quite
warmly.
   When the steadicam equipment is not busy injecting realism
into the tension-filled car chases--featuring the usual suspects
of overturned vehicles, exploding metal, tumbling fruit-and-
vegetable bins and fleeing tour groups--Frankenheimer plays
up the dialogue which is surprisingly tame considering its
source.  The screenplay, credited to J.D. Zeik and Richard
Weisz, has actually been re-written from the ground up by
David Mamet using the Weisz pseudonym.  Mamet's staccato
delivery is absent and only occasionally do we hear his
signature exchanges, as when Sam and Vincent compare
notes on the manufacture of the valuable case: "He had the
case made, he had the fake case made, he had the case
made," explains Sam, receiving the reply, "He didn't have time
to have it made--he didn't have time to make the fake case."  
  Jonathan Pryce is perhaps the only really edgy character in
the film and in his short role as an Irish operative with an
array of facial expressions, he eats up the scenery.  The
others do a creditable job with what they have, and what they
have is really a standard action movie given particular
advantage by the stunning French scenery.  Filmed primarily
in Nice and Paris, "Ronin" plays up the noir magic of the City
of Lights on a humid night, the rain casting its spell on the
cobblestone streets.  And the adventurous samurai can't help
taking in some of the splendid scenery on the Riviera as they
haul their Beamers top speed through tunnels, hilly passes,
and graveled country roads, firing their guns as they survey
the Cote d'Azur.

Author
greg king
In the 60's, John Frankenheimer was without peer as a director
of taut action films and riveting political thrillers.  His more
memorable films included Seven Days In May, The Manchurian Candidate,
Seconds, and The Birdman Of Alcatraz.  Since the 70's though his
career seems to have stalled with a succession of grim, second rate
thrillers, like French Connection II, Prophecy, 52 Pick Up, and The
Fourth War, that only showed brief glimpses of his true talent.  His
tv career has thrived in the meantime, with a number of critically
acclaimed HBO features.  But now, the 68 year old returns to form with
Ronin, a gutsy post cold war thriller that shows many of today's hip
and flashy MTV inspired younger directors a thing or two about making
tough, stylish action films.
Historically, the ronin were disgraced samurai of feudal Japan
who hired themselves out as bandits or body guards.  In this action
thriller, their modern day counterparts are a group of free lance ex-
spies, former mercenaries and disillusioned cold war warriors, who are
gathered in Paris for a mysterious mission.  They are to snatch a case
from a heavily guarded escort.
But once these experts in the clandestine arts have
successfully stolen the case, they find themselves ensnared in a
labyrinthine web of treachery and murder.  Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard,
from Breaking The Waves, etc) double crosses everyone and makes off
with the case himself, hoping to sell it to the highest bidder.  Sam
(Robert De Niro), a former CIA agent, and Vincent (the wonderfully
droll Jean Reno, from Mission Impossible, etc) join forces to retrieve
the case and uncover the identity of their mysterious employer.
The deft and sinuous plot has been written by J D Zeik,
Richard Weisz and an uncredited David Mamet.  As with both Pulp
Fiction and Robert Aldrich's tough noirish thriller Kiss Me Deadly,
what's actually in the case is never revealed.  The contents are
immaterial; they are what Alfred Hitchcock used to refer to as a
macguffin, a red herring that is irrelevant to the central plot
development.
The tough characters are suitably enigmatic, and we learn
little of their background or motivation.  The performances from the
ensemble international cast are solid, and of an unusually high
calibre for the action genre.  Both De Niro and Reno in particular are
excellent as a pair of cynical former spies, while Natascha McElhone
(from Surviving Picasso, etc) is alluring and mysterious as Dierdre,
their nominal boss.  Ronin also includes appearances from three former
Bond villains - Sean Bean, Jonathan Pryce and Michael Lonsdale - which
adds to its flavour.
Ronin is a tense action thriller that delivers on its promise
with brutal efficiency and energy.  But the highlight of Ronin is
undoubtedly its series of superbly executed car chase sequences, which
eclipse most recent cinematic car chases, and a gun battle in the
streets of Nice that recalls Heat.  Cars race at breakneck speeds
through the tunnels and crowded autobahns of Paris and the narrow,
twisting streets of Nice, leaving a trail of carefully orchestrated
destruction in their wake.
This adrenaline charged and testosterone fuelled film keeps
the audience hooked throughout its numerous twists and turns and
improbabilities.  Frankenheimer directs the material at a slick,
bruising pace that rarely lets up.  Ronin is indeed a welcome return
to form for one of Hollywood's most influential premier action
directors!
